Slicefizz! Her flaming blade tore through the flesh of an unwitting troll.
The first half was mostly characterised by nervousness and few clear chances were made before the goal on half-time. United only needed to avoid defeat and looked set up to play on the counter-attack. That being said they weren’t completely negative and pressed City high up the pitch. Whenever City passed the first wave of defence, United defended the edge of their box fairly well and opted to cut off the angles for passes into the feet of City’s forwards rather than engage them directly. That said, City still managed to make passes into United’s penalty area and Samir Nasri was particularly good at finding space and passes in the first half. The ploy worked fairly well but the narrow and compact centre left their flanks exposed at times with City exploiting the left-back zone especially.
“Well,” I said, “it was way before they had an iPad.”
and even the bad experiences can be learned from,
Then a contact for pictures.
MORE VEGETABLES 101 Is there a vegetable that's a mystery to you? Let me know, I'll feature it in another post.
LJ Fort: My favorite team was the Chicago Bears just because all my family is from Chicago. My favorite player of all time is Charles Woodson and that’s why I wear number 24 my whole entire football career.
" Parallel Cards (combining to drop 1 per pack)
And more importantly, how many drinks and what kind did you have at Cheesecake factory?
The follow up to "Losing A Friend" was a double A-Side, "Closer", another Griffiths composition, and a cover of the Eurythmics classic "Sweet Dreams". The video for "Closer" was being rotated on 'The Box' and mirrors the video "Whole lotta history" by "Girls Aloud" which was made months earlier. The single was released on October 23rd. Although it had previously made #1 in Iceland, it failed to reach the top 40 in the UK.
Several alleged right-wing extremists have been charged with terrorism offences in the UK in the past year. In one case, a jury convicted Martyn Gilleard, 31, a neo-Nazi forklift truck driver, who wanted to “secure a future for white children” and kept explosives at his flat in Goole, East Yorkshire. He built small hand-held bombs, and among the material seized were membership cards for the National Front, the British People’s party and the White Nationalist party. He was sentenced to 16 years in prison.
As I mentioned earlier I went shopping in New Orleans yesterday. The town was buzzing with people getting ready for the LSU vs Alabama game this weekend. It is a crazy place to be right now but I manged to maneuver through a VERY small portion of it to shop. Here is my one and only purchase of the day. Vintage place mats that I will eventually get framed:
So I don't think we really need to say much more about such profound ignorance. As this stuff falls squarely within my own field of professional exspertise, however, I will make one more comment: Answers to questions that are obtained from young college students (which is mainly what Judis is referring to) often tell you very little about the real world. The very first piece of psychological research that I ever did was based on responses from students and I found a most gratifying correlation of .808 between the two variables concerned. Being a born skeptic, however, I then did something that psychologists almost never do: I repeated the research among a group much more representative of the general population. And I found NO correlation between my two variables on that group.
Thanks for stopping by and I hope you like my card. Please leave a comment, I love reading them.
operatic melodies
9.) Add 1c shredded cheese (optional)
We found where all the hot, heated water is pumped in.
“When I turned 13 and the famous Corvette Stingray came about, that car was pure sex and just an incredible machine. I wanted it.
Driving Directions from Hotel to Washoe County Regional Shooting Facility – Pyramid Range Friday for long Range Rifle and Pistol, Saturday for Steel Challenge Pistol shooting, and to the Sage Hills Gun Club for Cowboy Fast Draw on Sunday.
O.K. Noted! She just wanted me to trust her. I did, but I can’t help being a mum. It’s part of the job description!
And then came the awakening moment...the bottom box.
The London-based Observatory for Human Rights, which has a network of activists across the country, said 10 were killed.
And my favorite get! Nuts mags!! they are just... PERFECT! the gal I would love to be! february issue is about make up and the best make up brands which I enjoyed a lot, and feel inspired again. March issue is more about fashion, real fashion and trends 8D uhm... gashion, gal+fashion! hahaha i'm loosing my mind -_- I work too much.
Or you can go back to listening to Metallica and Lamb of God, you boring loser.
This is my first SOLC, in fact, this in my first time participating in any SOL. For the past year, I have read people's slices, but never took the risk myself. Until this March. Anne Rice's quote resonates with me because I am quite timid when it comes to writing my daily slice and clicking on "Post." My writing talent pretty much exists in the research paper writing genre, and I could cite using APA format with my eyes closed (without a citation generator, of course!). But when it comes to creative writing or writing about my daily life experiences, I am very intimidated.
Then you came along with sunshine and roses to share.
I am not the most academic person so I have found it astonishing that I have actually survived this long re-packaging the pages upon pages of academic journal entries. I’ve done about 1/4 of the work that has been set for us.
Modern fantasy reveals a fascination with names. In The Lord of the Rings, there are names in many tongues, and ancient words hold in them the power of revelation. Most characters have multiple monikers. The shift in a hobbit-like creature to a wasted, tormented obsessive is characterised through a change of name from Smeagle to Gollum. The handsome hero of the epic is known, among other things, as Aragorn, son of Arathorn, the Dúnadan, Longshanks, Wingfoot and Strider.
Well since I did take my Prozac yesterday I am feeling a little better today. That or the children at work weren’t here today…so that may have also added to the better mood.
I hadn’t been to Jerusalem since I was 11 yrs old or so. I wasn’t planning on a big adventure. The service from Ramallah drops off near the Damascus Gate, so I figured I’d wander the market a little, have some delicious street food, and spend some time marveling at the Dome of the Rock, and head back around dinner time. I knew, of course, that this little day trip of mine – like so much else I’ll be doing this summer – is something most Palestinians cannot do, that my simple day off plans are a forbidden fruit of inexplicable proportions to millions of people. My wait at Qalandiya checkpoint – regardless how long or whether I get stuck in the turnstile like cattle – eventually ends with someone waving me through, after all.
"G'day mate."
Control-V was first used for paste in the QED editor.
Timbuktu (2002)
As a remedial action and to show that I am indeed participating in a learning process, I’m going to make some changes. I have permanently deleted the post that set off the firestorm. There is no copy of it anywhere unless someone printed it off or saved it on their own. I am also going to start a new blog. I am going to stop writing this one and I am going to take steps to discourage my children from reading the new blog.
We have a grandson, who is now 7½ years old. We did not think he would make that age!
Corina and graduate student Michael Grosvald, now a postdoctoral researcher at UC Irvine, measured the response times of both deaf and hearing people to a series of video clips showing people making American Sign Language signs or “non-language” gestures, such as stroking the chin. Their work was published online Dec. 6 in the journal Cognition.
19 years ago today was the Blizzard of 93 for the northeastern seaboard.
Which brings us to the last point for now.
For my card today I used the Simply Charmed cricut cartridge for both my beach ball and the shovel and pail. I used my Gypsy to hide the faces so that I could use the Wide Eyed Kids Face Assortment from Peachy Keen Stamps. The sentiment is from Scrappy Moms Stamps. The papers are from Stampin' Up!, Papertrey Ink, and my scraps. Thanks for looking.
I pray for this young wife and mother,
I felt that the rookies knew enough to win but they really surprised me. The rookies lit up the crowd, the veteran squad and myself with a performance that made us all think that they were practicing in some secret location and had waited until now to show what they really had. Dominant, in control, calm and cool, the rookies dismantled their opposition. Hits did not rattle the rookies’ resolve to play their game and they are now Fresh Meat no more.
I am a mirror that wants to incarnate
So you fall off the horse, get back on
I took a lot of pictures yesterday XD So am just showing a few now..
But don't ask me what I'm going to do with a new baby here.............I haven't got that far yet!
Today is a free theme for the design team...you just never KNOW what they'll come up with...please take a look, right here, and watch this space...I think I'll be using stencils a LOT in future! Isn't this hobby we share just the BEST!?
1 1/2 cup (12oz) Vanilla 0% Chobani Greek Yogurt
The invaluable Calculated Risk blog provides a more accurate view about the strength of our current recovery (clic the pic for an even more enlightening image):
Melt the half the margarine in a large saute pan over medium heat. Raise the heat to medium high and brown about the chicken. Transfer browned chicken to the slow cooker. (The image above is the chicken barely hitting the pan, still raw.)
This week, it's all about learning spaces. So no matter where that is for you, it's time to share some of your world with us.
Si, uno e' Brad Pitt, lo giuro, vestito da ciclista. Yes, one is Brad Pitt. I swear, with a motorcycle get-up.
I'll start with a Pie chart. Unfortunately it doesn't illustrate anything except that I'm balancing limited hobby time across a number of projects. But I do like pie charts (and it adds a splash of colour to what could have been a long rambling post).
Red foods: strawberries, cherries
Lesson 2
These can be whipped up in about a half hour, or you can make some the night before, freeze, and reheat as needed in the oven. I had planned to freeze these and serve them next weekend when my boyfriend is visiting, but I might not be able to resist eating them all before he arrives!
It turns out: very. The kids behaved splendidly through the next set of errors.They were jovial and respectful, despite the sugar rush, and they might have even learned a thing or two about Shakespeare.
D - Bean Burritos, Broccoli
Yours, on the verge of vegetarianism,
One cannot blame external forces for all that’s not right in Pakistan.
Pepper Jack Chicken
Ruth was the ideal adviser for this project, titled “Newspaper Distribution and the First Amendment.” The research centered on legal battles over the placement and appearance of newspaper newsracks, among other issues surrounding newspaper circulation.
I have spent the past seven and a half years in a profession that is as curious to me as it is to the people that knew me before I ended up there. It was taken up strictly because of the benefits and flexibility that it provided me in terms of being a mother. My younger child has spent every school vacation with me and not in a camp or daycare. I have been incredibly involved in every aspect of his life and we are thick as thieves and love spending every moment together. That I would not trade. But as he grows older, I see that it's time for me to take some of my life back. I have done what I have been threatening to do for so long….. I have made a change and set the wheels in motion.
So I finished wrapping T’s gift and proceeded to put the final touches on it. I’m always impressed with my wrapping. It’s one-of-a-kind and legendary. Then it dawned on me. I could teach you all (quite easily) how to wrap a gift, and make it the most epic wrap-job ever! People will love it. Trust me. Sometimes people admire my wrapping more than the gift itself. Which is fine by me because I’ve been poor for a while, and the gift is usually nothing special (It’s the thought that counts though, right?). Being poor is why I started wrapping this way in the first place. I was around 8 years old and we didn’t have any wrapping paper. To me, it seemed silly to waste money on paper to cover a gift, when there was something so pretty inside the kitchen drawer!
Let the fun continue, chickens. And good luck getting back out there.
With the recent rubbish from Dr Knutt, a quick read through the comments brings up some interesting points worthy of further discussion. One that particularly sticks in my mind is the idea that if alcohol was discovered today it would be banned, and why are other drugs banned when, side by side with alcohol, they appear less harmful.
So, the very next day at lunch, I had another piece of information for them. Plopped myself down, opened my yogurt, shook my head and rolled my eyes,”So, guess what I did last night?” Well, they knew I didn’t commit suicide, because I was there, sitting with them.
GreenTime Bags: Donna G
Docklands
I mainly used size 3 and size 5 round sable brushes for painting. Next, loosely apply watercolor directly
Given Paramount's close ties to the genre of comedy, it should come as no surprise that it would produce some of the greatest comedies ever made. Indeed, Paramount was the home of auteur Preston Sturges for may years. It was at Paramount Pictures that screenwriter Preston Sturges would make his directorial debut with The Great McGinty in 1940. Christmas in July (1940), The Lady Eve (1941), Sullivan's Travels (1941), The Palm Beach Story (1942), The Miracle of Morgan's Creek (filmed 1942, released 1944), Hail the Conquering Hero (1944), and The Great Moment (filmed 1942, released 1944) were all released through Paramount. Indeed, Sullivan's Travels is not only often counted among the greatest comedies of all time, but the greatest films of all time as well.
1 gained
Peter Hitchens has a go at our extradition agreement with the USA, which I thought left the issue rather unbalanced. It is all very well talking about Christopher Tappin, and how badly he is being treated - and I would not disagree with the points made. But what about the European Arrest Warrant?
instead, tim is up for a promotion.
For full flavour, make these a couple of days before serving, I let them sit in the brine solution, stored in the fridge for three days before I actually eat them. On the second day, I tested one (alright, a few!) and found that I got to add in more rice vinegar and sugar, depending on how sour or sweet you want. Stir with a chopstick or long spoon and wait for another day or two before consuming.
The LaBrosse truck arrived at 7:30 on a Saturday morning – this was not a during-office-hours job. After hammering through the bricked-in fireplace in one of the first floor offices, Ernie cried out, “Look at this!” We ran into the room and found him holding up a petrified bird. “There’s all kinds of great stuff in here,” he said with an archaeologist’s glee. Minutes later, he yelled out again: “WOW, I CAN’T BELIEVE THIS!” What had he found? Gold doubloons? The Holy Grail? Micah Whitmarsh himself? No, just the biggest build-up of soot and mortar crumbs he had ever seen.
This native wildflower shows up in late Spring, but seldom in greater abundance than this year. This is probably a result of the two winter wildfires that burned through the park. After a fire, the roots shoot up an abundance of sprouts, which make big clumps of flowers. Goat’s Rue is nutritious for livestock and they love to eat it. As a result, this plant doesn’t last very long on heavily grazed pastures.
Here in Britain, Björk scored her biggest hit single to date (No. 12) as a collaborative effort with David Arnold. "Play Dead", a song taken from the film, 'Young Americans', is now available as a bonus track on cassette and CD copies of "Debut". Prior to that, Björk's first venture into dance music was also a joint effort. "Ooops", a 1991 signle by Mancunian dance masters, 808 State, featured Björk's distinctive vocal tones, and is also featured on their album, "EX:EL".
May our Father bless you and take you out of a place of worry into the place of peace, as He leads you beside still waters and restores your soul.
The head has been ready for some time, but the original picture I took was so poor I'd been waiting to photograph it again with the finished model. I'm posting the head here alone to keep to a separate post for each element, in case anyone does one day want to find it again for reference. The rest of the pictures of the finished model I'll post as soon as I finish the write-up on how I got the various effects, hopefully this weekend.
Rating: 4 of 5
OTs mid Solo NOTs are forced to get these out-tech actions to be able to get back onto and stay on the level and complete it. Not to mention the spiritual effects of the out tech that this has on each OT.
“Yesterday?” I stuttered. “‘All my troubles seem so far away, now it looks as though they’re here to stay’ Yesterday?”
I love all of the comments! Keep them coming. One thing I keep hearing is "want less of this....more of that"
DANG IT!
The policeman apologized to Prof. Sinclair for the inconvenience, and he promised that someone would be punished for the disappearance of Pete. Obviously, he said, Luis and Enrique were involved in some conspiracy, perhaps a ransom plot gone wrong, and they had waylaid poor Pete when he was cornered in the second room. As Pete had been missing for two weeks and no ransom notice had been given, the policeman did not offer Prof. Sinclair much hope.
So you’re the youngest of nine? I have to ask, how was that?
Then one day, months after Mindy and Jeff have buried the little girl, they answer a knock at the door. Standing there, staring at them with frightening blank eyes, is Jenny. She has returned -to their house, to their lives - to exact a revenge that goes beyond death.
Andrea Fanjoy,
The Mother’s Day boardroom drama signals a capitulation by Yahoo to demands from hedge fund Third Point and its aggressive chief Daniel Loeb that the company move in a different direction. It also ends a contest between the struggling company and Loeb over the makeup of the board of directors that had been headed for Yahoo’s annual meeting later this month. Loeb sparked the latest confrontation when he revealed that Thompson’s corporate biography claimed a computer science degree he did not have. …
Vacuum Man starts jiggling his tied-up hands. “Please can take off?” he says.
There are so many amazing themes in Great Expectations I don't even know where to begin to debunk this statement. Moorcock is posturing as if each Dickens novel contains only a single theme. There are more great themes in Great Expectations alone than I can count on all my fingers and toes. If you don't believe me read it yourself. What on earth does Moorcock mean 'non-intellectual writer'?
The travel allowance is contingent upon the Postdoctoral Fellow’s completion of his/her initial one-year contract. In the event that the appointee does not fulfill the initial one-year contract, the appointee shall be liable to refund the University a proportionate amount of the travel assistance granted to him/her and his/her dependents on appointment.
For the international community he was a far-sighted and experienced leader, a stable and trusted interlocutor in a flammable area, who created a state where for as long as he himself governed, Slavs, Albanians, Serbs, Turks, Vlachs and others lived harmoniously together.
My favorite shot although it is not real clear!
April finally wins at the game of monopoly. We tried to surrender, but she insisted on taking it to the poverty-stricken end of all of us. (April insists that I mention this is her first time beating me - that is why she is so happy. But come on, it's been over 15 years - it was bound to happen eventually. Rematch anyone?)
This particular park had a small garden with a dog that spent most his time locked in a cage when he wasn’t chasing away unwanted critters. I felt terrible for the poor guy, and unfortunately, I don’t think I have any photos of him, but I will always remember his sad eyes.
In his book, “On Killing” Lt. Col. Grossman, a military psychologist relates the function of police to that of Sheep, Wolves and Dogs. He says that ordinary people are for the most part sheep. The criminals are the wolves and the police are the sheep dogs.
And of course the traditional mixtape (previously seen here, here, and here). I just realized I never blogged Thing 1's birthday mixtape last year. Oops. I'll have to do that. I love putting these together, but after three years of doing it for both girls I'm starting to run out out of upbeat, good, age appropriate songs. My goal when I put these together is to avoid Top 40, give them some songs they've heard, introduce some songs that I love, and find some that are new to both of us. This is basically self-defense since I will have to listen to it about a thousand times in the van. Man, I forgot how much I love The Safety Dance. And I reacquainted myself with college music that makes me kinda cringe now but I secretly still dig it (Book Of Love).
Jess was interning at the 2002 Hay-on-Wye literature festival, a festival of books, authors and thought which has been running since 1988 and has exploded from a tiny local event to a worldwide phenomena: there are offshoot festivals in eight different countries now, from Kenya to Colombia, and authors are joined by politicians, Presidents, comedians, actors, musicians, Nobel laureates and around 85,000 visitors for the Welsh edition alone.
1462 D-IV/8/2003. “As Massachusetts Goes . . .: On Ratifying the Constitution of 1787.” Constitutional Law Course, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Aunt Gay tipped me off to this pattern, it is a spin on a Wrapping Paper Quilt pattern.In a nutshell... you cut strips varying between 2" and 4". Adhere fusible batting to your backing. The stroke of genius is that as you sew your strips together, you sew them to the backing. Poor explanation I know, but what it boils down to is you are quilting as you attach your strips. Makes for a fast, cute quilt!
Early on, many well-meaning people acted like Lacey was a burden her family had to bear, especially for Peggy, whose life revolved around caring for their daughter. Once in a while, Peggy viewed her daughter in the same way. She began to question God. “Children are meant to be a gift from the Lord, not a burden, aren’t they? So why is Lacey a burden?”
OH, Crap!
7) I love to write! I have written a Children’s Book and am still proofing a book I started 3 years ago.
As I am talking books about Paris, hotels and decor I thought you might also like this one, French Bistro: Seasonal Recipes by Bertrand Auboyneau, the owner of the Paul Bert Bistro in Paris. It is one of my readers favourite bistros in Paris... I have yet to try this one so it's on the top of my list. Tracey recommended their book and it does look fabulous... full of wonderful recipes and thoughts about Bistro eating... xv
Now, I've lived here for almost 40 years. Neighbors have come and gone but a lot of us have lived here for that long or longer. I have no teenagers that live close to me any more. This is a safe neighborhood and I've never been afraid. I have never been pranked before. But neighborhoods change over the years......sometimes not for the better.
It has been brought to my attention that EDF are now using a bouncy nipple to flaunt their wares. After much discussion with colleagues, cohorts, Geraldine at the bus stop and, Cybill Shepherd, I have discovered that the bouncy nipple is in fact a Zingy stress toy. So not a nipple after all, but a squeezy ball instead - an easy mistake for any of us to make, especially when sallying forth up a darkened alley way. Thankfully EDF is at hand with Blue Energy to light up the passage so that this type of unfortunate mishap should become a thing of the past.
Creating margin probably means that I won't get Christmas cards out until the end of January, and my house won't be uber-decorated. After all, something has to give. But it will mean I make time for a leisurely visit with my dad at his Alzheimer's facility. And time to volunteer in the church nursery for a holiday-crowded event. And time to invite a new neighbor over for coffee. Hopefully, it will mean that my energy won't get diverted by a frantic, self-imposed agenda. Only by God's agendathe essence of true simplicity.
As surely as I live,” declares the LORD,
His monstrous streak forever unleashed.
And that closeknit family The Skinny Boys namecheck Bill Cosby as a major role model – Cosby the patrician, whose increasingly moralistic show always sees the parents putting their errant kids back on the rails of life with an appropriate homily and a firm hand, Cosby the massive shareholder who is believed to have engineered the dismissal of liberal David Puttnam from his influential Hollywood job.
The two big kids started school last week. My daughter started high school. (She is 12 in a couple weeks).The school has been incredibly lacking in communication with us. We were told they would send us information, it never came. We called and they told us they didn't have a booklist. My daughter starts school and discovers the other kids had books. So past few days we have been searching for books when most stores have sold out. If the teachers tell my daughter off for something that is out of her control I will not be impressed. Meanwhile my boy started grade 4.
I was dying for some freedom
Based on the latest survey results, that sort of strategy is not a winning move in many communities this spring. In fact, in local markets where inventories are tight and competition for homes rising, realty agents say that buyers looking to steal houses by low-balling their offers are ending up at the back of the line, their contracts either rejected out of hand or countered close to the original asking price.
Wee has bred all her rabbits in hopes of good litters and all the goats should kid Thursday night.
How to write this crime novel that has been floating in my head for more than a year has given me some trouble and following it to nowhere is not helping a lot.
Our brain, muscles, blood, and lungs contain so much water. Water is used to transport nutrients to organs and oxygen to cells. Water is used to regulate body temperature. Water detoxifies our body and protects our joints and organs. Water is one of the most basic necessities for a healthy body, clear mind, and balanced internal and external muscles and tissues.
We all like different kinds of music, that’s why there are so many of them, but did you know that there is a website, where you can listen you the music, which suits your taste, rate the tracks and get paid for doing so?
How can you cope with the side effects of exhaustion, weakness and fatigue? One way is through DNA-specific antioxidants.
When the world recovered from the Great Devastation (as it’s called), the Atlantic Ocean was gone, creating one immense continent surrounded by water. Antarctica and Australia were uninhabited. The few island groups that existed were in constant danger of being swallowed by the remaining oceans, so efforts to inhabit them were quickly abandoned. The peoples of earth spread throughout the continent and grew roots. The calendar was reset at 1 AD (After Devastation).
Obvs the mini galvanized bucket (found online for 99 cents!) holds my cotton swabs and then the Liberty for Target canister hold cotton balls and the votive holder captures hair elastics, barrettes and tweezers.
There were villages all along the route, sometimes announced by no more than a trail leading off from the main road. I stopped at a really pretty village tank to stretch a bit and have a juice. It was 7:45am and I’d come about 40k, which wasn’t bad.
It is more expensive to buy organic. It just is. And it's WRONG...
This year for Goofy's actual birthday we were going to be on a plane headed to the happiest place on earth - Disney world! So the party had to be done early & it naturally had to be a Disney themed party. The kiddos love the Mickey Mouse Clubhouse videos we borrow from the library so that became the theme.
But what am I to do with all this room now that a chill is in the air?
The Bersih 2.0 rally on July 9 last year drew a big crowd of protesters, and a small army of policemen.
Two years ago, October “Toby” Daye believed she could leave the world of Faerie behind. She was wrong. Now she finds herself in the service of Duke Sylvester Torquill, sharing an apartment with her Fetch, and maintaining an odd truce with Tybalt, the local King of Cats. It’s a delicate balance—one that’s shattered when she learns that an old friend is in dire trouble. Lily, Lady of the Tea Gardens, has been struck down by a mysterious, seemingly impossible illness, leaving her fiefdom undefended.
There is a “cheap booze” application on Android, but it doesn’t seem to work. I twittered a while back asking people to let me know about booze & pub applications on Android and some nice people replied. Thanks to all that did. Of the applications out there, Bar Finder and Cask Marque are worth a look and do link into Google maps. Both are free to download. Wetherspoons are developing there iPhone app for Android so soon that’ll be all you really need. Why go anywhere but your nearest spoons and pay more? There is a CAMRA beer guide available but at over £4 they can keep that. If they want to tell me about the better CAMRA approved pubs near me they can tell me about them for nothing. Even found a free Oktoberfest guide. All of this though is pub and bar information.
Recently I have moved from Dayton OH, home of the Wright Brothers and all things aeronautic. I vaguely remember hearing about a Brazilian born Alberto Santos-Dumont and his self propelled airplane in my early schooling years, but not enough to be able to realize his accomplishments in history.
Little Miss Harper is a tough one to set down. She just so happens to get fussy as soon as I sit down at the computer, and her favorite time to be awake seems to be from when the boys go to bed (8ish) until she finally lets us go to sleep, around 11pm. Since those are prime blogging hours for me, it's just not happening.
It warms my heart to think the Universe is doing all these delicious things for me. And all I have to do is “let it.”
It is only a matter of time before the struggling permanent underclass which has long propped itself up on the backs of taxpayers will find that they must do more for themselves or suffer for it. The horror of so many unnecessary deaths witnessed during Hurricane Katrina may serve as a precursor, a perfect microcosm of what the socio-economic future may hold.
reasons it became so popular over the years, more so now with its current contemporary new look it fits into a variety of personal styles and dress codes turning every guy into A Man of Style! During the week day your chino is a perfect fit for your business casual attire, a fitted cotton dress shirt in stripes or gingham with maybe a cotton tie or even a fun plaid bow-tie under a sport coat or a cotton blazer, paired with leather loafers or some other form of leather shoes/boots will make you look professional yet comfortable and stylish. For after hours and for a weekend easy, casual look, pair it with a chambray shirt or a striped long sleeve T (both with rolled up sleeves), accessorize with a vintage looking necklace, maybe even a hat? (if you insist on being trendy than go ahead and roll up your chino) and pair them with a fun casual looking sneakers like a colored converse (NO running shoes please!), or a vintage style military boots.
So, we put the light bulb directly on the bottom of the microwave (remove the glass plate if you have one!)
My biggest love though, about this well designed tablet thingy, is this: I can sit in my armchair and use it. Which means that I can sit in the same room as my lovelies....even if I am ever so slightly not engaged! Now, is that logical-ised bone idleness or a really good point?
that 11 am wouldn't work for me either as my
I used my wire to make several groupings of beads (blue-orange-blue), and connected them together to get my desired length. I connected them all together simply by using my pliers and makings little loops at the end of each wire piece, the loops are then hooked together. This gives the necklace the ability to move, rather than stay rigid. One end of the chain of beds then got a jump ring, and the other got a clasp. Voila! New necklace :)
Stamp- SU Contempo Christrmas
When he wants to wash he rolls in stinky mud,
As I previously reported on this blog, fast-food company Chick-fil-A is locked in a highly publicized trademark dispute with a Vermont folk artist named Bo Muller-Moore. While the public has rallied around Muller-Moore, he suffered a legal set back when the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office issued a preliminary ruling against his trademark application for “Eat More Kale.”
According to Outer Rim Emperor the batcave is one of the most recognizable places in superhero comics. It took him 2 months to build it and the result is amazing! Although we write about the new movies by Nolan, Outer Rim Emperor was inspired by the early Batman work (1989 movie by Tim Burton).
Happy Mother's Day! I am blessed to have a wonderful mother who never seizes to amaze me. Sometimes that means, I don't know what else to do but shake my head. But nevertheless, blessed.
A body of England’s breathing English air,
That is, until my daughter Addy took the dog-sitting job, which required me to be the designated driver.
EDIT: I shouldve posted my email addy for anyone to respond to. heav_c@hotmail.com
This company offers so many credits per year depending on how many you buy. Obviously the more you buy, the more vacations you can go on. They started out offering a $25,000 time share. After saying no a million times they finally went down in price to their "starter" package that was $8,700 for 7,500 credits. That equals about two weeks of vacation per year if you book 30 days or less from departure. After thinking about buying, I called Ryan's stepmom who owns a time share. Within two minutes of calling her, I was talked out of doing it. Ryan still wanted to do it and we were told we could cancel the contract within 5 business days (we were shown that in writting before signing anything). So we said yes because we wanted to find out more and look more into what it is really about. Our sales person was beyond excited and started telling us how much fun we were going to have, how to get the most of our vacations, what a good deal it is, blah blah blah.
At RM55 (US$18) per entry, I can teach my own kids to be reporters, thank you very much.
I did get one of those crochet projects done this week. It is a baby papoose that I started writting when I was preggers with Livie (who is going to be 3 this month). I never got to the point of typing it up so I was working with 3 year old chicken scratch on pieces of paper, backs of envelopes etc. It was hard to remember where I was going with my idea so I just winged it and am happy with it.
Love you forever,
Having spent about half an hour in the dentist's chair this week I had plenty of time to think of some questions that have always troubled me about dentistry.
It was a great weekend, with a great bunch of kids. Everyone had a good time, and hopefully learned a little something about how to survive if they ever get lost in the wilderness.
The God is reborn today, and the days will lengthen with his growth, into the fullness of Summer. In some villages, way back in the past, hearth fires would be extinguished (a brave thing when you didn't have Zippos or matches or even two sticks to rub together). They would be relit from brands taken from a community balefire, lit by the sun himself with a little help from some glass (or a hidden coal or two - c'mon, we weren't above a little showmanship, back then), thereby bringing the sun (and, one hoped, his blessings) into the home. It also kept the community united, because everyone shared the same fire, the same light and heat. Cool, huh? Gotta love a religion that encourages playing with fire. Ahem.
Sometimes I want to stay with them
“What other fun is there?”
The thing that we have learned is that in yard sales, as in real estate, it's location, location, location. Our last two yard sales took place when we lived on much busier streets with nearby apartment buildings. Here in the suburbs we had much less traffic. But still ... gone are all the small appliances and electronics; gone the Christmas ornaments and decorations; gone the kitchen ware; gone the lawnmower I no longer use.
A story more Oy! Oy! than Oy Vey! perhaps.
Dear Mike,
No one person is like you in every way! If I were involved with a guy who was exactly the same as me, I'd probably get bored really fast! So why would I expect someone else to act, be and approach the world in the same way as me? I don't. Yet, in relationships with a partner, we often do expect the other person to react the same as we would!
“Dear X, we refer to the outstanding proceedings for patent and unregistered design right infringement against your client, IPOff. As you know, our client is seeking an enquiry into damages or (at its option) an account of profits arising from your client’s blatant infringement. We are now proposing, on behalf of our client, that your client concede that it has infringed our client’s patent and unregistered design and meet any damages or account of profits the court awards. This will save a lot of time and money, and we could make a deal on costs. Our client is willing to call it quits if yours agrees to this proposal. Please note that this offer is made under CPR 36, and our client will rely on the costs consequences set out in Part 36. The offer is open for 21 days only. After that we will pursue the claim with the utmost vigour.”This letter illustrates all sorts of issues about how not to write when proposing “settlement”, including certainty as to what the offer really is – and it also illustrates some continuing problems for claimants in IP disputes who would like to rely on Part 36.
3) The Little White Horse by Elizabeth Goudge. If it's good enough for J K Rowling, it's good enough for me. Orphaned Maria Merryweather goes to live with her uncle in Moonacre Manor in Devonshire and transforms the entire valley, bringing lost lovers together, unravelling a family curse and even glimpsing the visionary 'little white horse' - all the while having perfectly wonderful feasts. How I longed to be a 'Moon Merryweather' when I was young. A few years ago in Hay-on-Wye, I snapped up an early edition with the original illustrations by C Walter Hodges, the version I'd read as a child. The plate showing Maria's turret bedroom represents every little girl's dream.
He also pointed out that you can find anything on the net in order to create a particular setting.
Oldest, Middleson, and Babyboy dance with excitement. "God healed our car!" Middleson wisely stated, "Mommy, it was a test of faith."
One of the more popular events is Downtown After Five, a FREE street festival on Lexington Avenue the third Friday evening of each month. Live music, happy people, food and beer, and some of the funky shops stay open late. The first concert this year will be May 20 featuring the Asheville Horns and Bayou Diesel, and a mix of music follows during the series. Beer sales help local nonprofits. Other concerts will be June 17, July 15, Aug. 19 and Sept. 16.
BUT, from the most recent NOLA.com (Times Picayune) story of the type of barbaric violent criminality here in New Orleans that results from the blame-shifting and reality-reversal commonly excused away by the afro-uplift lunatics at the New York Times :
Fuck my life and fuck that guy.
“Pretty much all of the above, but still, I can’t accept this.” I held the check up.
This Holy Thursday (Maundy Thursday). my friends, is the appropriate opportunity to dedicate ourselves to each other and to the Crucified LIfe in Jesus. It was at the Last Supper that the Lord Jesus offered Himself to the Father and to the Church – He, of course , carried out that dedication at Gethsemane but it was at the Supper with His Disciples that He offered Himself as the Passover Lamb:
But thanks to yesterdays set at the end of the always quirky talent festival M4Music at Zurich’s Schiffbau from Joker and his companion MC Nomad I began to see why this has gone on for so long. Joker, being one of the very big names in this genre, tore the place down with his bass. Hidden beneath though was a kaleidoscope of all the trends in London electronic music of the past three decades. It is amazing how such headphone heavy sound can get a room of people into an ecstactic frenzy. And frankly I’m glad to have witnessed it.
as evidence of your belonging.
Conversely, let’s look at the “price” of being CF. You save all that money and time to use on yourself. You’re able to be more independent, buy things you wouldn’t otherwise be able to afford. So what “price” is there? Not passing on your family name? Well, it’s really narcissistic to think passing on your family name is that important. Not having someone to “take care of you when your old?” What the hell is the matter with you? Take care of your goddamn self! Why do you even want someone taking care of you? That’s no way to live (quite frankly I’d rather die if it came to that).
May God Bless You And Keep You In The Palm Of His Hand.
One thing I find fascinating is how Mexicans continually try to run a business from their home. Our neighbor to the right turned his home into three separate studio apartments. Our neighbor to the left added a boat renovation business. The neighbor beside him decided to build 18 apartment units - they build until he runs out of money, and then it sits, and then it starts up again. The lot across from that neighbor has been fenced for several years, and it looks like they just keep trying to add sand to level out the land - they still have a ways to go.
After dinner last night I went back to the lounge just to see if they had any of those s'mores cereal bars left. I'd forgotten about the drinks/snacks, but I was quickly reminded, and before I knew it I was chatting away to people while drinking red wine. As I went out for a big lunch today, I skipped dinner tonight and went straight to the lounge!
Midterm, Part II
So baby, there is room for you now!
“These stables were estimated to have cost $250,000. The stalls were made of Spanish mahogany and the floors were covered in tiles set in a zig-zag pattern so that the horses would not slip. When the main castle was completed, it was connected to the stables by a tunnel. Here, in 1944, in utmost secrecy, the Royal Navy placed an assembly plant for ASDIC, an early form of sonar which was vital in the battles of the Atlantic. The existence of this factory was disclosed only after the Second World War had ended.”
I remember the day I turned thirty. I was actually thirty years, three months, and nine days old and it was when my best friend Vackie looked at what I was wearing to a party and he said, "Isn't it a little too young?"
I actually really like the tin this comes in; I think the vintage image is really pretty and it's quite slim so definitely one you could take with you on a night out! Inexpensive enough that you won't cry if you lose it too (there's a story here involved with my Chanel lipstick that would make any poor person weep!). Inside, the balm and application puff are encased in plastic which does make it look quite cheap but what else can you expect for that price? Looking at the Benefit website, I think the 'take a picture... it lasts longer...' probably comes with more product and I imagine a much better applicator but hey ho, it's £22.50 versus £4!
We had exactly the same thought ourselves, shortly before we blacked out.
Because my Sudeley Castle post won’t be ready for publication until tomorrow, I’ll finish this post with two more interesting photos taken in Hverarönd, Iceland.
Sam and Abby strutted over to the sign and put their arms around each other. Sam smiled into the camera, forgetting all about the strange man. She'd never felt so happy in all her life.
Then I did it...right there on my phone. I hopped on the Twitter Train.
That's just ridiculous. June? That was almost half a year ago.
Inevitably, I was socialized into the whole greeting thing. I say hi to people now, but sometimes I still pretend to text, back up and take another route, look elsewhere, start talking to someone near me, if I am not in the mood to say hello.
New York’s highest court said for the first time on Thursday that expert testimony about false confessions should be allowed at trial if it is relevant, reports the New York Times. But the court also seemed to set a high bar for determining that relevance: In a 5-to-2 decision, the judges upheld the convictions of Khemwatie Bedessie in the rape of a 4-year-old boy, arguing that the testimony of her expert witness was not germane to the specifics of her confession.
For my Design Team project,
By Chapter
That’s progress. Gays, straights, and the Irish all unified in their quest to get drunk and be proud.
And then I hit the publish button.
Enjoy the pics of us at Dollywood and enjoy the rest of your summer! God bless...
And I thank God I’m alive
An area of architectural photography that I fell has yet to be fully explored in the commerical sense is . This lack of exploration I think is due in part to the fact that a detail shot is one out of 12 or so different shots that would be used to document a building it’s design elements and function. By abstracting architecture the function is in part if not fully removed. Additionally I don’t think architects like their buildings to not look like there buildings it no longer becomes about the sturture and the architects vision but about the vison of the photographer and how they experienced the space.
Our bodies' house three entities, the mind the subconscious mind and your Source energy or spirit if you will. There are three of you. And if you doubt this think about those moments that you have argued with you. Your mind might think something like, “I'm beautiful” Your body might feel good for a fleeting moment which is your spirit agreeing with your thought. But then immediately right behind that something in you rebuttals with something like, “You are ugly” which is your subconscious spouting off its embedded negative vernacular language form childhood;' it has been referred to as our subconscious beliefs.
......... for we haue seene his Starre in the east, and are come to worship him.
Results and any recommendations coming out of the study, including best management practices, will be made publicly available, said Stahl.
As promise, I'm back with my pregnancy announcement card.
For those keeping track, Arsenal’s lead is now halved; a lone, paltry point stands between victory and a tie.
Friends of the Earth are in a panic that Republicans might actually get the U.S. government to cut back on the insane spending that has put the nation on the edge of sovereign default. Lately they’re claiming that Majority Leader, Eric Candor (R-VA) “is threatening to sink the American economy and undermine environmental protections so that his wealthy friends, including big oil corporations, can keep sitting on their cushions.”
I´m happily surprised with the sound on my masterrecording. Because it was outside and the park is quite close to the sea
There's nothing we love along the open road more than an over-sized object to get your attention, and there's a great, big one in the humble New England berg of Johnston, Rhode Island. The Yankee Supply Company, who make used industrial warehousing equipment their specialty, has a 12-foot tall, gleaming red hand cart in front of their headquarters on busy Route 6, near exit 6 off I-295. It's so big, in fact, the wheels are actual Continental brand automobile tires. The Yankee workers refer to it as the "Paul Bunyan hand truck" and it occasionally leaves its perch to travel (by large truck one assumes) to trade shows (thanks quahog.org).
Secure leaders are not afraid for team members to be better than them. In their mind it equates to overall success not personal competition.
But whether real or imagined, home-made or bar-bought, a cocktail is always a perfect treat: and as Fitzgerald expert and fellow cocktail-afficionado, Sarah Churchwell, is wont to remind me, 'cocktail' is also a verb. So then, when shall we next cocktail?
The tastes are strange bedfellows. The pale flavors (hops, crystal malt) are the first flavors, and then a mild roasted, nutty malt kicks in. It evolves throughout the sip, but the flavors clash rather than getting along nicely.
I preached this message in the church again when one member asked me concerning the Seventh Day. It was an opportunity to explain to the church why you specialize in the message of the GRACE.
Time to sing to my baby and pray for my friends. New ideas. A sense of physical well-being. Nuggets of wisdom from digging through God’s word. Enjoyment from a sip of coffee.
Maybe I’ll work that in to a New Year’s resolution somehow!
xoKahl
This is a brew that I had originally planned as a partial mash, but since I had my cooler mash tun up and operational, I decided to adjust the recipe to be almost all grain with just a few pounds of extract at the end to kick the gravity up.
And after Freddie’s parents died he sold the house.
The teachers who do understand they must adapt in order to have their learners move ahead are very motivated but lack materials to make education ‘hands on’ or learner centered. This past week I met some teachers who are incredibly talented with recyclables and had the glimmer of hope that change can occur. Who knows, Obama became President!
Here’s the little park I found:
I have started a regular workout routine
. . . Because willful infringement in the main must find its basis in prelitigation conduct, communications of trial counsel have little, if any, relevance warranting their disclosure, and this further supports generally shielding trial counsel from the waiver stemming from an advice of counsel defense to willfulness. Here, the opinions of Seagate’s opinion counsel, received after suit was commenced, appear to be of similarly marginal value. Although the reasoning contained in those opinions ultimately may preclude Seagate’s conduct from being considered reckless if infringement is found, reliance on the opinions after litigation was commenced will likely be of little significance.
Life certainly can be ironic. Or come full circle. You know, like a bead. On January 2 of this year, the last day of winter break for my kids, I took my daughter Annie to JoAnne's to buy some fabric. She was using gift cards she'd received for the holidays to buy fabric because she wanted to make bags for Beads of Courage, a program that I love to support. Beads of Courage provides beads for children who are dealing with serious illnesses - different beads are assigned to various treatments. As you can imagine, some of these little fighters have multiple strands that are filled with all kinds of beads. So Beads of Courage not only depends on artists to create beads for the program, but it also relies on volunteers to make special bead bags for the kids. Annie, who loves to sew, had wanted to make these bags for a long time. So that's how we found ourselves at JoAnne's, picking out some fun fabrics on January 2.
Pax vobiscum, y’all.
We have a way of feeding people that doesn't involve taking food to the foodbank. We love donating to the foodbank and do it occasionally, but in this economy as self-employed people there is not a lot of excess grocery money to go around at our house.
I enjoy keeping house and take pleasure in small, daily chores--opening the window blinds in the morning, washing dishes, folding linens. I even enjoy making the bed. But in the summer, I give myself permission to not make by bed.
3rd CFL-1 Fisher Grant
A depleted Bafana Bafana outfit held Ghana to a 1-1 draw in their training match at Royal Bafokeng stadium in Rustenburg on Sunday.
What helps make lunch last longer, aside from S.’s brilliance and vibrant personality (of course), is finding a good place to park it for lunch. Two weeks in a row now, I’ve found myself polarized to Market Table for the task. And hail its consistency, MT has kept its side of the pact!
1/4 cup cold prepared espresso or very strong coffee
William intervened. "We're as happy here as we'd be anywhere else. Happier than if I were in Stateville."
Interestingly, a communication professor briefly touched on the same topic during a recent class discussion. He said that he enjoys reading most when he can cuddle on his couch with a book. Again, the e-book takes the intimate feeling away.
Later that night she apologized in a text, but I’m still hurt over the whole ordeal. Just because she had a bad day did not mean she had to take it out on me. There are already a lot of issues over this wedding and I don’t think any of us need an Auntzilla amongst it all. Sigh…
Phil Ivey’s attorney David Chesnoff said “Mr. Ivey intends to dismiss his lawsuit as he believes Full Tilt is taking steps to see that the players are paid,”
You need to post that people can vote for your blog nominations! I thought those were awards you ALREADY won...you could have tens of thousands of votes if people knew they could vote - cuz you ARE everyone's favorite!!! - Semblance
An alternative approach to the big bundt cake is to bake a big quantity of smaller cakes. Most of the time when I bake a bundt recipe, I use 2 loaf pans, or a bunch of mini-loaves. When you split a batch of cake batter, you have enough for every mood and occasion:
Chris Foschini’s biggest concern is that young people graduating at the high school level do not have sufficient education about money management. Chris would push for mandatory financial education before graduation. “Our country’s financial crisis is a result of poor money and debt management. Part of the solution must be educating our young people to make wise decisions and planning when it comes to their financial future.”
the chosen weapon in the
JOHN 4:4-26
But there is a McDonald’s right outside our office. And there aren’t many places in the neighborhood for snacks. The thought of a vanilla soft-serve crosses my mind from time to time, especially on a sunny day like today. And well, I finally gave in.
I left the above ^ section about his personality the same from the last update because that hasn't really changed. Gabe is super easy-going and fun-loving. My MIL can't get enough of him and she thinks he is the best little baby boy and so well-behaved. He is super chill and just...fun! He knows his boundaries and is very obedient when he is told to stop. He is always trying to make people smile and laugh and is usually pretty successful!
Every time the subject of human personhood is raised, somebody immediately argues that legal recognition of personhood would mean an end to in vitro fertilization (IVF). It is true that any procedure that has as a byproduct the killing of human beings prior to birth would be outlawed­and that includes IVF. But few want to admit this fact. Apparently it’s unpopular to be truthful.
Brief overview of Saltwater Fly Fishing Reelsjumbo loans, mortgage, home loans, property loanjumbo loans, mortgage, home loans, property loanjumbo loans, mortgage, home loans, property loanjumbo loans, mortgage, home loans, property loanfree antivirus software, anti virus program,
I figured I would kick off the ICD tutorial series with a project I've been wanting to make for quite some time. I first saw this tutorial a year ago over at One Pearl Button and have been dying to make these for my nieces ever since.
Bear Republic Crazy Ivan IPA
I hadn’t considered my patter.
Felt his hand squeeze mine,
‘Whilst acknowledging the role of the police to keep people safe and the unpredictability of some violent patients on inpatient wards, it does not logically follow from a duty to keep people safe and prevent crime that the police have a legal right to use physical force to allow mental health professionals to forcibly medicate. This remains true even where the necessity of forcing this medication upon patients is justified under the Mental Health Act. To do so, it may well be argued, would be an assault.’
Obviously, labor advocates do not see the issues that way, and again, there is nothing wrong with that; from their perspective, and within the frame of reference of the issues – i.e., the unhelpfully-vague provisions of the Constitution – they are doing exactly what they should be doing. That does not mean, however, that their point of view is any more correct than the government’s.
The story is about a son who does not believe the absurd tales that his father has been telling him and others over and over again. His father says that the day he was born, he was out catching an enormous uncatchable fish, using his wedding ring as bait. It’s only when the young man’s father suffers from a stroke that he begins to trace his father’s life and learns that his father is not a liar, but great storyteller. He made mundane occurrences of life memorable with his tales, of course by adding some spice. It’s a beautiful film of acceptance, and makes you want to ‘believe’. Not many films make you feel like that.
Margery Clute was born in the village of Baildon, on the outskirts of Bradford, in 1824 - less than 20 miles from her more well-known contemporaries, the Bronte sisters.
The F.D.A. had initially cleared the clinical trial in January, 2009, in what was viewed at the time as a research milestone.
Dear friends at Anthropologie,
But this year, he cared. As a matter of fact, all he ever talked about was HIS BIRTHDAY PARTY WITH FRIENDS!!!
Chances are it won't be there when you go back. That and you also won't be able to remember which booth it was that you even saw the item. It sounds silly, but I've gone searching up and down rows of booths trying to re-find an item, only to be unable to locate it (and leave the flea in mild frustration). It happens.
Total weight gain: +17.5 total. This is +1 from last week. I was scared to step on the scale this week and was pleasantly surprised to see only 1 lb. after the major feast-eating I’ve been doing over the past few days.
Los Angeles Lakers vs Chicago 5:00 ET on ABC
Also, pass history. Review:
— From “Aubade”, by William Empson
While this sauce business is going on, cut your sweet potatoes into little chunks, sprinkle with olive oil, sea salt, and pepper, and bake for 25 minutes at 350 degrees (fahrenheit).
The legality of this state of affairs is I gather currently being bounced about the European courts. I hope the courts consider the rights of humble EU citizens to live in a free market and not be stitched up by large corporations that seek to cut the world into separate markets for exploitation. The EU is one market, not many. I hope the law of contract in the free market supersedes that of copyright. I hope more than expect, mind you. If the kybosh is placed on this noble attempt to stick two fingers up at the cartels of large corporations, hope lies in the internet. The internet has all but ended copyright in music, TV and film. I’ve found a few websites that show any sports game in the world streamed live, but still have little interest in baseball. It looks a bit blocky when I plug my net book into my TV, but it can only get better. It might mean letting my mates in my house to neck my gorgeous collection of cheap lager and incur the wrath of the squeeze, but at least it is one up on Rupert Murdoch. I wonder what the legalities are if I take a netbook computer into a Spoons and use the free wifi to stream footie to the table my mates and I are sat at? An experiment may occur.
The settlement total came to $170,000, according to the American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) of Massachusetts, which represented Glik in the case. He was initially charged with a felony, under laws meant to ban illegal wiretapping, but the charge was dismissed.
- pick ONE room and do it right, top to bottom.
The sound of an harmonica in the opening bars of this mid-tempo number is almost all the real interest that will be generated for the next 2:23. The song, written by Gerry Goffin and Carole King, is presented in such a matter-of-fact manner that emotion seems strangely absent. This is all the more striking given the obvious bluesy roots of the song.
* Black Friday shopping
As I talked about above, most well known series start with a successful book one, so I would urge concentrating on producing a brilliant standalone rather than working up a series proposal that may not fit with publisher’s long term plans.
March 24 Shank Hall, Milwaukee WI
where it's a run.
The interview is usually concluded by thanking the guest. The interviewer may then turn back to the camera and say goodbye to the viewer, as well as tidy up any script requirements such as leading to the next piece in the program.
1) Chart Update. It’s Wednesday, which means yesterday was Tuesday, which means I got on the scale and weighed myself. Down a pound! Definitely moving in the right direction, especially after last week’s depressing 3-pound gain. Here’s my chart:
Paper: Whisper White, Kiwi Kiss
C.O.
I will most likely blog far less frequently, and if I drop off the face of the blogosphere at any time during the remainder of the month it will be because I intend to disappear into the dark dungeons of the library. Wish me luck!
The majority of the album was produced and recorded by Dave Fridmann, at his Tarbox Road Studios in upstate NY. It was Weezer’s 1996 ‘Pinkerton’ album and The Flaming Lips’ ‘Clouds Taste Metallic’ that initially attracted the band to Fridmann. "I first heard those records when I was a kid, like 14 or 15. I think that was the first time I was ever aware of 'production' really - they were so dark sounding, sonically, and had a lot of ambience and to my ears at the time that seemed so unfamiliar and interesting, I love the sound of those records” says Gary “and for both Steve and Dave, capturing a good live take is of paramount importance, both concentrate on having a band in the room playing together, but where Steve believes the band should do whatever they think is right and he’ll facilitate that to the best of his ability, Dave is hands on, he’ll encourage you to record interesting sounds, to experiment with sonic textures, to try things you wouldn’t normally do and be free in the studio.”
Always so fast. Everything finished and ready before he even managed to see that it needed to be done. Always ready to solve every problem, even those that were none of her concern, before he even had a chance to think about it. Like an impatient steam locomotive she charged ahead, trying to make everything right. But it was not possible to fix everything. The more he tried to demonstrate how distant he felt, the more zealously she made sure it wouldn’t be noticed. And with each day that passed he had grown more conscious that it really didn’t matter what he did. She didn’t need him anymore.
On that boat and in that storm, human strength failed. About six years earlier Paul wrote this to the Corinthians in 2 Corinthians 12:10. “Therefore I take pleasure in infirmities, in reproaches, in necessities, in persecutions, in distresses, for Christ’s sake: for when I am weak, then am I strong.”
My heart feels like it has been ripped out. It has since i left J but it’s more pronounced at the moment. It physically hurts.
But I'm thinking back on the conversations I've been part of since coming here. With the scared expat arrivees, who worry how to find a way through this. With some upstanding Kenyan friends, who are clear they won't be paying a bribe, no matter what the consequences. And I remember the safety advice tendered by the experienced police officer when I was a freshfaced student twenty years ago.
½ pound unsalted butter, melted; more as needed
Stir in the tomato purée, lower heat and simmer for 10 minutes. Note: if your tomatoes are not meaty, add a tablespoon or two of canned tomato puree. Add the stock and simmer for about 1 1/2 hours or until the meat is tender. Remove bay leaves. Slowly stir in the roux and cook over low heat stirring until the soup thickens and is smooth. Correct seasoning with salt and pepper to taste. Add lemon juice and 3 teaspoons of parsley.
Who is telling the truth? You can make up your own mind.
While in my home away from home I craft on the dinette table. Sometimes I put two leaves in to make it really big....but I am trying to be good this time and only work on small projects like cards etc...
This one pours amber with a copper tint, and as always a great tan head that sticks forever. Decent carbonation.
And warm to the heart
I know! This is one of those stories -- like Going Bovine -- where I heard the description, thought "too wacky for me" (ignoring all the evidence that I love wacky) and didn't watch. Then I listened to those who said I'd love it, got the DVDs thanks to Netflix, and I watched it and guess what? I DID LOVE IT.
Level 12: MP Cost: 17, Attacks up to 4 enemies 3 times, Damage: 214%, 6% chance to stun the enemy for 3 seconds.
“. . . that just anybody can come do this job is also a misnomer. We consider these people skilled workers because they are pretty much professional harvesters, and they’re even skilled to particular crops.
This one is thankfully easy. No hoops or loops to go through. And trust me, with my ever growing belly, you do NOT want to see me go through HOOPS and LOOPS. Heh!
17. Crosseyed & Painless
A big thanks to Carrie for joining in with this series. Remember, if you want to check out who else has been on this already, just click the 'Kiss Me, Kill Me' box somewhere on the right hand side of this blog. BTW, if you've enjoyed this series so far, do feel free to link and retweet, I won't charge you.
i'm leaning towards a barn wood look.
What is the music scene like in Gwangju?
18And there were voices, and thunders, and lightnings; and there was a great earthquake, such as was not since men were upon the earth, so mighty an earthquake, and so great.
The heath was also where Nazi environmentalists gathered together at the end of the war to find some solace. Environmentalist Hans Klose, who never became a Nazi because he was married to a Jew, reorganized what was left of the German conservation movement. He helped Nazi environmentalists graduate from the de-Nazification process with minimal difficulties. In 1949, it was Hans Klose who said that the years 1936-1939 were the green heyday of the German conservation movement. Earlier, three landmark Nazi environmental laws were passed (1933-35). During the same time frame, the Nazis also implemented sustainable forestry practices called "dauerwald," which means "eternal forest."
Now there is no other mode of action whatever; and the "world" is only a word for the totality of these actions. Reality consists precisely in this particular action and reaction of every individual part toward the whole--
“Then said Paul, I stand at Caesar’s judgment seat, where I ought to be judged: to the Jews have I done no wrong, as thou very well knowest. For if I be an offender, or have committed anything worthy of death, I refuse not to die: but if there be none of these things whereof these accuse me, no man may deliver me unto them, I appeal unto Caesar. Then Festus, when he had conferred with the council, answered, hast thou appealed unto Caesar? Unto Caesar thou shalt go.”
The views and laws for hemp are different all over the world. In Australia for example, although you can legally grow hemp (without the drug ingredient THC), hemp foods are not legal. While in North America, the opposite is true. The lucky Canadians who supply much of the hemp found in the U.S. are reaping the benefits of a 1/2 billion and growing industry.
I have had involvement over the past couple of years with BC People First – advising regarding Woodlands and being involved in the “demolition ceremony”. I’ve also had involvement with BCACL regarding the “history plaques” being planned by the New West City Council – those still need work if we are to tell the real history of Woodlands!
She stops. She turns and kneels down next to me and begins to talk.
“Most prosecutorial misconduct is not intentional, but we know from John Thompson’s and Michael Morton’s cases that when it happens, the consequences can be devastating,” said Cookie Ridolfi, professor at Santa Clara University School of Law and Executive Director of the Northern California Innocence Project and the Veritas Initiative. “What’s clear from this data is that we’re not doing nearly enough to document the scope of the problem and the disciplinary systems as they currently exist are vastly inadequate.”
RV99
If you would like to audition please send email to ttbc.music.recruitment@gmail.com.
I'm back!!! After getting home from holidays and getting sick then our internet (router) died and NOW ... Finally I am back online... albeit still a bit sick .. anyway I'm HERE :)
And the layers of story
Balmain served up plenty of gold for the Fall show. I do love me some gold. Plenty of Purple Rain references like brocade and velvet. No secret I'm a gold fan, posted about some yummy vintage gold pieces I love last month(see Gold Finger post) and I'm definitely a Prince fan, check out my blog mantra. There is plenty of vintage gold lame from the 80's/90's it just about throwing in other elements that make it current not stuck in a time warp. Like a good shoe/boot, a Kirkwood or even a lace up Frye boot, then throw in a vintage 20's hat for interest.
Please RSVP to info@brooklyngreenway.org with Columbia Waterfront Park in the subject line. We will send you a link to background information to help prepare you for the discussion on February 2nd.
This is a tragedy for the herders with global consequences. Aerosols are a strong feedback to the global radiative budget. In plain English, this means that dust traps heat. This can have both local and global consequences as the trapped heat changes the global air circulation, impacting storm patterns, heat waves, etc.
A fun, bright, cheery card for a dull, grey Friday the 13th!.
A nice little housewife
4 combination
but still can’t seem to reach them?
Kegged: 05-08-2009
Bloody little brutes!
One of the major initiatives for ABC is expanding its digital unit, ABCi. In ABCi’s third-annual mobile survey, 70 percent of Canadian publishers said advertisers will demand more accountability as they spend more on mobile buys. ABCi is meeting that need with new staff, new ideas and new digital report formats, such as the m.Audit. The Canadian Digital Advisory Committee also offers necessary input for how ABC can continue providing accountability for digital publishers and buyers. The committee, which was founded in early 2010, discusses the emerging digital advertising marketplace and its potential for member organizations. ABCi and its progress in the digital marketplace is something to watch in the coming year.
Then to the amazing Heronswood property with a gorgeous cafe within a thatched roof cottage style building located at the back of the garden. The same garden where they get their organic produce from to make the delicious food served at the cafe. And for the coffee drinkers amongst you the coffee was organic, fair trade and very easy to drink.
Another one from my childhood when my Dad did some project work for the World Bank in Kyrgyzstan. One of the souvenirs he brought back for me was a small wooden statue of a warrior called ‘Manas’. My Dad told me the background of the story about how he fought off the Uighurs and was considered a hero in Kyrgyzstan and a strong part of the national identity, similar to Ghenghis Khan in Mongolia. Barely anyone had really been to Kyrgyzstan back then (not many people have even now) so I value its uniqueness to me and how it has made me bring back exotic travel ornaments as souvenirs of my own journeys.
I enjoyed this story and I have to admit that I did cry in spots. This was a nice little change in my reading routine and I am happy that I got to read this and I am looking forward to other books by Ashley.
We pass several businesses along Lake City Way, obviously well marked; dedicated to dispensing medical marijuana. Most of the medical marijuana businesses is burnt out and appear looted. Several of the medical marijuana businesses have bullet-ridden facades that might have been caught in a pitched battle.
That would be to dampen the screeching morally outraged crescendo he so carefully builds up to. The DA is obliged to investigate. The media is not. The DA is absolutely wrong. The media is absolutely right. That is the unthinking (and poorly researched) position of a moraliser and, perhaps more disturbingly, somewhat hypocritical for a person trained in the law.
The men said that they were part of a violent gang and “used their strength in numbers” to persuade the girls that “resistance or escape was hopeless”.
The Zionist wars of aggression being played out around the globe are a danger to us all. The latest propaganda by the Jewish President of the USA, Barry 'Obama' Dunham seeks to dæmonise Pakistan and to stir up separatism in Balochistan. Whereas the imperialist wars have so far focused on countries with relatively few emigrants to Europe and the USA, any attack against Pakistan would be of a wholly different nature.
First of all, let me say AARRRRRGGGGHHHH!!!!!
And now your running from me
Deidre (the dragon) still needs to be finished – the eyes need doing (might just put some false eyelashes on her) and the wings need attaching somehow?
Some two hours later, I woke up to a quiet house and realized we had all dozed off.
33. Tequila -- The Champs
Dizzie
Anyway, this year I took several books away with me, and not all Grishams or Coopers. The first of which was the very much hyped and popular One Day by David Nicholls.
It's the part of me that strikes up random conversations with people in the line at the grocery store and makes my children whisper urgently, "MOM. You don't even KNOW HER."
Just before serving, use a warm kitchen knife and room temperature chocolate, gently shave chocolate into swirls, and dress top of cake.
I used to pick figs off my ex-mother-in-law's tree and eat them back in my 20's. Loved them. Other than that and fig newtons, I know nothing about figs. It seemed lots of the group were having trouble finding fresh figs, but I went to Publix and they had them in their fruit section. When I began to cut them in half, some were really mushy, while others were not. So not being a fig "expert," I was not sure which ones were good to use. I decided not to use the really mushy ones.
The earth fed on flesh and fury,
-post Thurgood's room on the blog
Vicki: That's a valid question. You're not the first to ask. Would you believe, we've talked to people who minimize their laundry by taking their old, ready to throw away clothes with them on a trip. After they wear them, the clothes get tossed in the trash!
Amidst all the poems uncovered from years past, here's a new one:
Payday Loans Constrained by Oregon State Regulations Designers
I have mixed feelings about the proliferation of 9/11 images that have flooded the airwaves and print media these past few days. Nearly every story and image is powerful and moving but at a certain point you can begin to feel you're being used.
We were expecting White City Bus Garage to be a bit bleak, but it was magnificent, with an amazing bus cathedral where some of the buses were resting: occupying a huge area at the back of Westfields shopping centre, it had pleasantly planted tubs where Linda and I enjoyed our sandwiches before getting onto the 31.
1) I know repetition is a good tool for helping young children to learn but after hearing ‘The Map’ song for the first time I never wanted to hear it again.
Sunday morning Gracie woke up to her Easter basket at her door. She was excited to see all the Sesame Street toys, tablewear and books. We have read those three Elmo books countless times in the last two weeks! She was also excited to find Play-Do in her pastic eggs! After opening her eggs and starting the cooking for Easter lunch, we got all dressed up for church.
Joe E. Lansdale, story - Tim Truman and Sam Glanzman, art and cover
Son: Tim Weston
Anyhow, my love of sushi was the inspiration for Sushi Chick. It is a ToGoPortfolio box — an art box that you paint an original piece of art on then insert a CD and print portfolio into and ship or carry to a gallery or the media. It allows them to see the quality of your work and makes a great first impression.
How true. Homosexual militants such as Peter Tatchell, have already successfully achieved the lowering of the age of consent for sodomites. They now want the age of consent scrapping. Most pædophiles are homosexual, so the legitimisation of their diseased lifestyle is not only a mockery of marriage, but a direct path to the legalisation of child rape.
I'll try again tomorrow. We might have Fridays With Kristin on Monday. LOL.
She batted at his outstretched hand, then darted ahead, ever the curious one.
WINDS ACROSS THE SLGT RISK REGION…INITIALLY MODEST…WILL INCREASE WITH TIME AS UPR TROUGH AMPLIFIES ESEWD. THIS WILL BE ESPECIALLY TRUE OVER THE ERN CAROLINAS/SE VA…WHERE 500 MB WSWLY FLOW WILL APPROACH 40 KTS BY EVE. COUPLED WITH INCREASING UPR DIVERGENCE IN DEVELOPING JET ENTRANCE REGION ASSOCIATED WITH UPR TROUGH…SETUP THERE MAY YIELD A FEW LOOSELY-ORGANIZED BANDS OF STORMS WITH STRONG TO POSSIBLY LOCALLY DMGG WINDS INTO EARLY TNGT. FARTHER S…SFC HEATING AND SOMEWHAT STEEPER LOW-TO-MID LVL LAPSE RATES MAY SUPPORT MORE WIDELY SCTD…W-TO-E MOVING STORMS WITH STRONG WINDS OVER S GA/N FL.
So, the announcement.
Can’t believe it’s been a 100 posts so far. Even with that little break this has been a great accomplishment, but enough about that, let’s go have some music fun.
There is no limit to your charity,
The only version better than this is West Side Story that Leonard Bernstein created as a musical about New York City gangs. Dancing, singing, tragic knife fight. That’s romance.
If you don't have that kind of training, and few people do, your response to being told something is not real is almost certainly going to be that someone is denying your experience: and there are few things that make people angrier, especially if the experience is important to them.
Rebuilding Wages:
Saute spice mix with some cooking oil, stirring constantly on medium heat until oil separates (~15 to 20 minutes) then add in plum sauce and the rest of the ingredients. Check for seasonings, it should be spicy, sweet, sour and extremely fragrant.
Sleep: I have been so exhausted this last week that I have been dragging Ryan to bed between 8-8:30pm! The sun is still out at that time. but my body is ready for sleep and I haven't even woke up to pee in the night because I'm so sleepy. But watch out- the moment I wake up I'm running full speed to the bathroom.
All Desert Gardening is your desert landscaping company. We provide services for your planting, landscape, and gardening needs. Please feel free to contact us at
Clint's central character, Kowalski, is almost a caricature of a Real American, and Clint is enough of an icon to carry it off. I interpreted the film as a microcosm of today's America, and if this is reading too much into the script then so be it, but the analogy may be a helpful one.
Recognize the feeling of guilt : Unrecognized guilt eats at your soul. Name it; look at the monster under the bed.
"Laurel now knows the truth: Yuki is a rare Winter faerie, the most powerful—and deadly—of all, and she is working with Klea to conquer and destroy Avalon. With Tamani, David, and Chelsea by her side, Laurel prepares for a fight she never thought she would have to face.
On release day, after the Doc said I could go we waited ... and waited ... and waited some more. The nurses said they had to do some kind of paperwork and were waiting for them to bring a wheelchair up. I had crutches by this time and was getting handy with them. After waiting a couple of hours I was done. I looked at the husband and said "Get the suitcase!".
A magnitude 4.2 earthquake shook people in the Wellington region and parts of the top of the South Island at 11.33am (9.33am AEST).
There will still be too much information for some in this post.
I live by grace. And I walk by faith every single day. I’ve also discovered there is a strong, knowing, wise inner part of me some people get all spiritual about and identify as God’s voice or the Holy Spirit. That works for me, but calling it my gut works just as well. He put it there, after all. *
A note about the arrowroot powder... This is used to thicken the soup. I don't use cornstarch as I can't find an organic source and I am concerned about GMO's. You can certainly use cornstarch if you prefer but you probably will only need 1-2 tsp.
The island offers four homes strategically placed on the island to capture the views and to offer seclusion to its guests. Leading from the main house, beautiful white sand paths manicured and lined with conch shells lead to the various buildings, beaches and private harbour.
Zac Pennington: It’s sort of been in the works for a while and only been officially been stated, but we’ve been dealing with it for a while. Presently we’re getting to play the first shows with this new group, and it’s seeming to be working out pretty well. Rachel’s way was very essential to the way the live band work for a long time, but for the most part she wasn’t that...essential to recording process, and the writing process, so we’ve been working on things this way for sometime without Rachel being...extremely...umm...
The gray blur is a triceratops being launched in an attempt to free the ball. It only succeeded in knocking art off the walls.
Hashimoto’s kites try, often extravagantly, to break free, but never truly fly. Hence Hasimoto’s title for the show: Skip Skitter Trip Vault Bounce and Other Attempts at Flight. This expression of futility owes quite a bit to Icarus. The sculptural installations start out as hopeful attempts at flight, hundreds of light wood frames covered in semitranslucent Japanese paper hint that if outdoors, they may transported skyward with the lightest breeze. One is reminded of Has Haake’s Blue Sail, 1964, a floating sculpture which came at a time when art making was moving away from the goal of leaving the earth for higher planes of experience to merely leaving the gallery in search of actual experience itself. Hashimoto’s kites, like Haake’s work, congeal into hovering wonderlands of landscape, somewhere between two dimensions and three, leaving the ground yet ultimately unable to make it out of the systems which contain them.
Now I just need to work through the Germany part because this will be my first attempt at booking travel in Europe so it’s a massive learning and research curve to find the best options possible for the smallest amount without being too cheap about it and ending up being stooged.
Please note leaving a comment on my blog will not qualify you for this prize. This is the prize offered to the JustRite Challenge winner. Please see the JustRite Blog for challenge details.
The clover is blooming now that it’s getting hot. In the foreground is one of the plants we just call foxtails. I think this one is Hare Barley but I’ll have to take my weed book to the pasture to know for sure.
whose touch caused fires just that morning.
The facts remain. Nine lives have been irrevocably altered by what transpired. The truth of the situation, only they know. Our duty is to see that never again in our lifetimes do we see a repeat of something so ugly, and yes, painful.
It was worth it at every level. I love mountains- I turn to them in every situation, but this was something different, to see a point close at hand and know that no ground is higher is remarkable, I felt moved and even slightly tearful.
May 14, 2010 Clip No. 2482
Fernandes also questioned the need for a third runway in Kuala
Blankets or sleeping bag
Join us for a contest to celebrate Mother’s Day on South Granville!
too many clothes on in spite of the low temperatures.
In hell
I definitely plan on reading Insurgent this week (or possibly next week. In the near future for sure!). I’m really excited because I loved the first in the series and a little nervous that this one won’t stack up. But hopeful!
It's worth noting that former Eastwood and current Baylor star Jessica Ubanyionwu is currently ranked 9th in the country with 43"1.75 triple jump at the Tyson Invite. That is good for a NCAA provisional standard, hopefully it will hold or she will add a couple more inches. Also with a NCAA provisional standard is former Montwood and current Texas A & M runner Christina Munoz. 16:37.37 is the provisional mark she posted for the 5000 meter run. If anyone knows of any other ex-El Pasoan's with NCAA qualifying marks, please let me know.
Choice Publishing also offer additional services, including typesetting, book cover design and they provide a list of recommended editors and proofreaders.
Set in Vienna, our film follows Johann Strauss, Sr. leaving another concert event, after discovering his son Johann Strauss, Jr. (nicked named Schani) has been moonlighting as a violinist. Coming home, the elder Strauss reprimands his son for not studying law and instead going after a musical career. The scene seems like a echoing of James Dean’s Rebel without a Cause confrontation with his father, with Heir Strauss lamenting how now his 20 year old son can so blatantly disobey him. However this is over quickly, after the elder Strauss smashes his son’s violin. His father becomes a sort of villain for the first half of act one, something that isn’t quite clear. His father claims that Schani will hate a career in music, making it sound as if it was a painful horrid thing.
Basking in the bright colors
However, it took the death of a charity shop worker in a 3ft deep boating lake to bring about real change. Simon Burgess, 41, suffered an epileptic fit in March 2011 and died as emergency crews looked on. Police and paramedics were specifically ordered not to enter the water, a shocking revelation that led the Government to dispense with the health and safety barriers that have been hindering emergency workers. As of last April, officers who carry out “heroic acts” without regard to their own safety are now protected from prosecution. But in the wider community, goodwill and good sense are still open to almost wilful misinterpretation.
As to what can be performed and shown there are no guidelines. The idea is that if something comes up that is offensive to someone that we all be open to discussing it. Mostly we want to encourage all types of artistic expression. The next event is in June. To find out more look us up on Facebook and find the group.
The Sound were an English post-punk band, formed in 1979 disbanding in 1988. The band was fronted by Adrian Borland and evolved from his previous band, The Outsiders. They shared record labels with groups such as Echo & the Bunnymen and The Chameleons, and shared stages with Echo & the Bunnymen, the Comsat Angels, the Au Pairs, Modern Eon, Felt, Medium Medium, U2, Public Image Ltd., Eyeless In Gaza, The Stranglers, China Crisis, Thompson Twins, and Aztec Camera.
How cool is it that sock monkeys have become popular again?!
Last 2 weeks has been a little crazy for me, with practices for the dance exam, making cake pops and then rehearsing our dance routine for a performance at one of our girlfriend's wedding on Saturday. Some of the girls really liked my cake pops and had suggested that we make them as wedding favours for our girlfriend. And so we delegated our tasks: I had volunteered to teach 3 other girls how to make the cake pops, some volunteered to design and print the tags, and one fine day we gathered and put everything together. From the preparation till the actual wedding day was an extremely fun get together... maybe I'll put up a small clip of our dance a bit later too if you are interested :)
DATE AND TIME: April 3, 2012, 2:00 PM-4:00 PM
known only to a few, in certain high mountains,
I think it's an important part of our home economics to keep focused on what we're spending on food. I want to cook nourishing meals, I want them to be interesting and what Hanno and I like to eat but with prices rising so rapidly these days, a challenge to mindfully look at what and how the family food budget is being spent makes real sense to me. Cutting back on the amount of meat we're eating will give me the money to buy organic oats and flour and I'm very happy to be able to do that. And I guess that's what we all do with our various ways of shopping for food. We juggle this and that, we stretch meals out, we never waste leftovers, we shop for fresh food that's in season, we make do with what's in the cupboard and we build up a repertoire of good meals taking into account all those factors. That gives us a reasonable food bill while still serving up good meals.
Decision opposed by technology industry leaders, disability community, academics
This interview, which I happened to catch on the radio on my way home from work, really struck a chord. People can offend so easily without necessarily realizing what they are doing. They may mean well, but that doesn’t make it OK. For example, many people ask a couple who have dated for years when they plan to marry. Worse yet, almost as soon as a wedding is over, well-meaning relatives, usually female, ask when the happy couple plans to have children. I have all too much experience with these prying personal questions.
I don’t get nervous at times like this. Apparently this is rare, or so I’ve been told by a few people. Speaking in public, on TV or radio doesn’t faze me at all and it started me thinking why does this not faze me?
I was just joking on Twitter, saying "it would be fun to see a tribute album to BoA." People told me it really would be fun and that they're willing to do that together. This was how we got together in the first place.
But that is mere conjecture. The reality is that segregation of a 'natural' kind had always existed in South Africa. The so-called "Bantu" stuck to their traditional areas, and the successive British administrations did everything in their power to avoid having to import them into "European" areas. In this regard they brought labour from, first, England, and then from India and China with the express purpose of creating a perfectly acceptable type of segregation - one based on traditional homelands and areas of European influence.
Age: 27
This year was rough at some times, and I began work as soon as I graduated. I contribute my hiring to the construction knowledge that I learned from him. I confound contractors constantly that I know so much for being a 19 year-old girl. I enjoy driving trucks, and I slightly drool when I see a classic car.
"Writing in The Times in May 2007, Sir Hugh Laddie observed that "The Patents Court has been at the forefront of refining High Court litigation. Starting with Mr Justice Jacob (as he then was) for the past 15 years there has been an aggressive attempt to streamline procedure. Most things have been tried, including limiting (though not abolishing) documentary discovery."
The other great temptation that fell in guests' way at Bath was buttered rolls. These were considered unhealthy by the local physicians, but many guests found them irresistible and they seem to have been served everywhere. They are thought to have been first made by Sally Lunn, a Frenchwoman, and based on a recipe for brioche. Less like the rather sickly 'Bath bun' that is sold in Bath today and more like the Sally Lunn bun.
Construction workers pack house
2. Heat the oil in a large skillet or pan and pan fry each piece for about a minute on each side (do not brown), and set aside.
From now on all generations will call me blessed,
‘Ishaqzaade’ is the new romantic drama of Arjun Kapoor and Parineeti Chopra. Movie marks the debut of Filmmaker Boney Kapoor’s son Arjun Kapoor and actress Priyanka Chopra’s Sister Parineeti Chopra. Another new comer ‘Aftab Ahmad’, plays the negative role in the movie. National and Filmfare award winner Amit Trivedi who has composed beautiful music for ‘Dev D’ and ‘Udaan’ will also adorn the film with his music. ‘Do Dooni Chaar’ fame Habib Faisal has written and directed the movie. He is also the writer of recent hit flick ‘Band Baaja Baarat’.
Moss, who retired from the sport shortly before Mercedes last win in F1, in 1955, had won the British Grand Prix in the same year for the team. He has said he hopes this win can be the start of many to come in the near future.
Don’t get me started. I know that if I attempt to make this at home it just won’t be the same. It’ll be different, just like a bowl of soup, coffee and cobbler at home is not the same as eating around the campfire while stretching out sore muscles from sleeping on the ground all night. Dreamville offers more than road food, Jess offers good food that makes the road something to remember. There’s not a lot on the lunch menu…. But there shouldn’t. It should be And it is. One could argue that offering a ‘main entree menu’ with 14 pages of desserts, entrees, and side dishes hides the fact that the food is ‘So-So’ at best. My experience would prove that to be true. Check out the menu selection on line (see at bottom). While you might think you want more, think quality over quantity. If you think that everything on the dessert menu online will be there, think again. You might want to call ahead to see if she can make something special for you, or maybe just to see if she isn’t sold out (I have to go back for the cherry turnovers and rumor has it the apple turnovers sell out even faster!) There are specials, too: coffee for a nickel between 8 and 9 AM. This summer there will be fresh pies and ice cream. All the fruit used in the desserts are fresh, not canned filling! It’s clear the best ingredients are used by the Wizard of Dreamville, behind her curtain! All of this and I haven’t even mentioned how reasonable the prices are! They’re reasonable. So much that I wonder how she stays in business! There is a rumor that she is starting a Farmer’s / Flea Market on Wednesdays,
I have decided to get serious about writing. I started blogging as sort of an exercise in writing and somehow I managed to write less than ever in the midst of it. I've started to set aside a few hours a week to do nothing but seriously work on a book. I'm hoping to fulfill my original blogging intent which was that this blog would be more of an extension of my writing habit than a procrastination tool.
- source your product directly from overseas and remove your local distributor
So, the whole 30 minute demonstration went that way – asking questions, and guiding them to the right answer, while offering useful information at the same time.
Highlander for the Holidays (Highlander Series) by Janet Chapman is slated for release October 25, 2011 but as of yet there is no product description.
Yes. And a curious fear in the short time it takes to crack open the cover of White Noise and delve into the first page. He scares me. And enthralls me. But scares me enough that I haven’t read Falling Man yet. But I will. But kind of wish I already had. But I will. He is a writer I learn from and whose fiction haunts (me). His name reminds me of food, or a drink. Care for a DeLillo anyone? Yo, gimme a DeLillo on the rocks! DeLillo. Shaken. Not stirred. I’ll take a DeLillo with my Hitler Studies, thank you, and a pair of sunglasses. 1 flaming DeLillo, please, with a side of scallops. DeLillos for everyone, on the house! It’s raining. Non-acidic rain, we hope. Finally, it’s raining after the driest, hottest, windiest winter I can recall. It’s raining. Hard. The umbrellas have been located. Puddles were made use of. My little family is napping. The bookshelves are calling. Do you know where your DeLillo is?
please keep this thought in mind:
Falling Down
The trilogy of books looks something like this:
I will be sharing more pictures and details from our trip to Barcelona, this week, so be sure to check back.
What quaver -what heart aghast?
1 ammunition
to popular spy thrillers,
Mike.BTB
fry ribs in wok until well browned adding salt and fresh black pepper. Add all ingredients stir cover and simmer for 45 minutes to 1 hour (beef may take a bit longer as they are more solid). Check water now and again and add a little if getting too low. Then add a little water and conflour (tspn) mixed to thicken and serve with thai white rice and cucumber salad (finely sliced cucumber, salt pepper and lemon juice).
Yin represents everything that is cold, moist, dim, passive, slow, heavy, and moving downward or inward; while yang represents heat, dryness, brightness, activity, rapidity, lightness, and upward or outward motion. Both forces are equally necessary in nature and in human well-being, and neither force can exist without the other.
£6.99 paperback
1.Viking Queen
My sister and I started our day "tailgating" at a Champagne brunch at the Rivers Casino - can you say mimosa? I did! :o) We then tried our luck at the slots for a little while before we walked from the casino to Heinz Field. Along the way to the stadium we were snapping pictures (we are scrapbookers you know) and during one of the handoffs we fumbled the camera and it hit the sidewalk. Well, that was the end of that camera so all of the photos from inside the stadium were taken with our cell phones. Even though my beloved Steelers lost by three the experience was fabulous!
Back at the hotel, the festival of Guadalupe was STILL going on, so we walked to the square to watch some more madness. All that flying today took it's toll though so I was in bed by 10...it's a hard life!
you can get 15% off your order until December 10!
Although some supermarkets received the incriminating “fail” rating, the good news is that the overall performance of the industry has improved significantly, the report shows.
To judge by the catastrophic effect he has had on UKIP and the East Midlands in particular it seems his donations are as welcome as a dose of HIV - a clear case of the kiss of death - In 2004 UKIP obtained 26.1% of the vote in the East Midlands just 0.3% behind the Tories - now you will note that with Derek Clarke at the helm with his trusty drunk Don Ransome as his REGIONAL ORGANISER to aid him
3.) The power to walk on water.
Many of the young people around here are about as wild as feral cats although always well dressed. I often wonder if their parents even know what their kids are doing. Half the time I want to knock the shit out of the kids around here. The other half of the time I want to knock the shit out of their parents.
Plow United has a very extensive playlist covering numerous albums. How many songs are you planning on playing, and how are you going to choose them?
it sits on the dusty picture frame and waits
Yes, I have a favorite phase of the moon (please see the preceding sentence where I use the term “astro-nerd” as a self-descriptor).
Pinecones have seeds
I bothered to stay with Chetan for the first few chapters because the media hype the author got had raised reader expectations. I plodded through page after unhappening page of pedestrian text, hoping something would happen. Nothing much does. All one gets to read about is some schoolyard bullying of these three freshers, by a bunch of seniors. For the rest, Alok, Hari and Ryan just muddle through the semesters at IIT. A spot of romance, involving Hari and his professor’s daughter, completes the setting.
That’s why I say that we are seriously under achieving. Of course there’s the contingent that will say “well the world has caught up to us”. But considering how far ahead we once were, that’s more an indictment that we’ve stopped growing/progressing, than that the rest of the world has “caught up”. They’ve caught up because we’ve slowed down! And to say that we had a great meet in Daegu, or that we’re doing just fine, seems to be reflective of a society that has become complacent and accepting of mediocrity. Or what I call “The Barney Complex” – “you’re special just the way you are”.
They brought over plenty of wine, we listened to music, talked, and had a great night!!!! The pork took a little longer to cook because I bought like 7 pounds (yes leftovers are still being had by all), so when choosing a baking dish, it is wise to choose one that has plenty of extra room. BFF’s hubby explained to me that because the two loins were so close together, they heat wasn’t getting evenly spread within the meat. So, we transferred one to another pan and let them both cook about 15 minutes longer. This was perfect and I learned a good lesson!
For all the current readers of Critics at Large, we've resurrected the Luna Sea Notes website to publish previous C @ L posts. The idea is to introduce readers to pieces they may have missed from earlier in our incarnation. Since we now have a huge body of work to draw from, the goal is to post articles that may also have some relevance to events of the day.
Nearby a couple spoke with me. Twirling the flower in her hand, the woman said, “We’re both over 80 and we’re natives of Idaho. We’re here to give and receive courage because we know there is no reason for any of us to be treated as irrelevant. That goes for the government and the way it treats us and it goes for the way we treat one another here in our community.”
Never No More Blues
Clarke may have set a new world record if he hadn’t declared. He may also have been dismissed. We’ll never know. But his performance has clearly seen a dramatic shift in the court of public opinion.
I am getting really good at NOT being a judgemental mother.
The Vietnamese government has announced that they will support the patriotism of the Vietnamese people, so long as that is all the people project. In other words, the people of Vietnam are free to demonstrate against China, but if their is ever a hint of calls for democratization, the government will shut it down by force. The official announcement by PM Nguyen Tan Dung on Paracel and Spratly is definitely positive for the country, though it has been long overdue. There is so much more that the Vietnamese people need, and if the government wants to know what that is, they might want to take a look at Burma.
Bare thorns.
The winery actually only produces 6000 cases a year, half of their max capabilities. They only produce half because they want the most premium wine therefore they use only the most premium crush from their harvest.
This, by the way, is the opposite of anxiety:
I just finished 'refreshing' this one with some new plants. Many of these will probably become too
Cooper & Co already occupy a good chunk of the block, at 8, 38, 36–38 with their café at 30–32. The Lorne Restaurant, another famous Glasgow boozer which can be seen on one of the photos below, is also present by this time. Today it trades as Hootenanny.
"Waiting and watching. Weeping into your sleeves -- these are not the traits of heroes, neither Ulysses, nor Aeneas, and not Joshua. Think, rather, of Penelope. Think of all the women down through the years who have watched and waited -- but who, like the boys with their horse, wept and picked themselves up and went on -- and you will have a small sense, then, of the heroes here. The occupied, the bombed, and the very, very brave. This is Frankie Bard in London. Good night."
The banana caramel, Pig Flyin' explains, is made by dropping mashed banana into hot caramel and adding a little butter and cream. It's the kind of dessert that you could imagine Elvis eating with gusto, although this only leads me to crave strawberry jam and a little caramelised bacon too.
I used Flourishes’ Apple of My Eye stamp set, watercolored with inks. It’s very simple save for the coloring and cutting. The white cardstock has a texture similar to the tea towel.
The day is finally here! Our little dining nook is filled and decorated and has a purpose.
The Grimm tale makes the sisters irredeemably horrible, and they suffer accordingly – their mother
But then, whilst cleaning, I made around fifty odd trips up and down the stairs – exercise.
I should give you more of the backstory. Now that some time has passed, I have a much better perspective on why I made the decisions I made. First, the timeline: Around the time I broke up with Chef, I was really struggling with my first holiday without my ex fiancé. Wednesday, December 1, my ex fiancé dropped something off at my house, and it really affected me. It reminded me of how much I missed him and suddenly I was incredibly sad again.
Happy Valentines Day. Feeling romantic, obviously.
This girl LOVES swimming. She just puts these floaties on and she goes everywhere in the pool. We are so thankful we have a pool...I can't wait to put her in swimming lessons.
~J
Although taking off all of the covers, spot treating them, washing them, and putting them back on (damp may I add, since putting them on totally dry can be risky---they might have shrunk), has been a "job," the highlight has been seeing the pure joy on Liam's face as he runs and jumps on the mountain of cushions piled on our living room floor. He thinks he woke up and went to heaven.
I have been praying Colossians 1:9-13 over Caleb since he was in the crib and I thank all of you that have helped participate in answering this prayer. Keep it up.
I took the kids to see Santa a few weeks ago. The boys loved it and Caitlyn did not (as you can see in the pic). The Santa we went to was at Lincoln square and he was very good. He talked to the boys for about 5 minutes and answered all their questions. When he asked what they wanted Connor was very specific in saying a Nerf Stampede and a Paper Jamz guitar and even told him what Paper Jamz are, while Mac said "Surprise me!" (I was shocked since he has been working on a list since October). Santa replied, "Okay, I'll put some veggies in your stocking." Mac didn't hesitate at all to say, "Not that kind of surprise!!"
With the breast meat set aside and decided upon, now we have all the rest of it to deal with. Usually All The Rest is a broken-looking thing. The wings, maybe a drumstick or a thigh plus the anonymous bits and pieces clinging to the back, especially those pocket oysters - my favorite part of any whole chicken. Stack ‘em up and there’s quite a bit of meat. Sometimes it’s enough for another meal but more often you’re left kind of a drumstick short of reality. This is when other leftovers come in handy. A few frozen shrimp, perhaps a hunk of ham or some smoked sausage?
Place these portions on a parchment paper giving gaps, and allow it to raise again around 1/2 an hour, you can see that it would have swelled up again.
I love the way that this turned out in the end. Iam LOVIN this colour combo and can see me using it a LOT! The image has been coloured using prisma pencils. It’s the 1st time i’ve used that bluey/turqoisey coloured pencil and i LOVE it. The wooden snowflake is smothered in glitter but the pic doesn’t show just how sparkly this is. The papers are a mixture of basic grey/bo bunny and papermania. The ribbon and button from stash (coloured button with copics)
and the possibility of Salvation...
People noticed.
Though it had F Paul Wilson, Richard Lupoff, Ferdinand Fegg, Robert SIlverberg, and Darrell Schweizer on Lovecraft, the scariest thing seemed to be the $1.75 price tag to me. Yes, showing my age again. It would cost $7.95 today, maybe, but I still remember 12 cent comic books and fifty cent magazines. As I picked up my 50 cent museum piece, I wondered if someone had died or gotten sick and this magazine was sold off. How long had they treasured this in a closet or box? How many more were at the bottom of a city dump? The last place one would find a copy would be in a library!
How 'man of the people' Red Ken enjoyed lifestyle of a jet-setting executive - all on the taxpayer
it was easy for us to test
Well its late and time to dim the lights in charmed life land for another day. So until next time.......God bless.
#4- Kalee Jones- The Eskimo Queen (R)
Posting will be light today as I have to prepare and deliver a talk at Harvard’s Museum of Natural History, “Why evolution is true and why many people still don’t believe it.” It’s at 6 pm. in the Museum’s Geology Lecture Hall (24 Oxford Street, Cambridge) and it’s free (more information is at the link). There will be a book signing thereafter, and then I’m off for a well-deserved and bibulous dinner.
For those who have never heard of iamroses...... well get ready to be addicted!!!! Here is their site for you to take a look. Look out for some awesome blog hops/prizes and challenges as Iamroses team is pulling out all the stops!
I am so thankful to them for giving me a night off from cooking!
Norma Aleandro – The Official Story
"The base for our Krieks is a blend of three batches of a strong golden-colored beer, each fermented with a different yeast: our house ale yeast, which is of Belgian origin; our house Kölsch yeast; and the notorious wild yeast Brettanomyces. We’ve used Brettanomyces before, in the Red Devil, the IRB and in last year’s Devil’s Kriek. “Brett” contribues subtle fruitiness and barnyard character (think of smells in an old barn on a cold day) at low-level intensity and a horse blanket character (think of smells in a horse barn on a very hot day) at high intensity. Brett is also a component of many spontaneously-fermented French wines, as has legions of both fans and detractors in the winemaking world.
DEARBORN, Mich. – A 12-year vision of expanded Michigan passenger rail options moved closer to reality on April 10 at a high-profile construction launch ceremony for the City of Dearborn’s new Intermodal Passenger Rail Station.
“And the LORD said unto me, They have well spoken that which they have spoken. I will raise them up a Prophet from among their brethren, like unto thee, and will put my words in his mouth; and he shall speak unto them all that I shall command him. And it shall come to pass, that whosoever will not hearken unto my words which he shall speak in my name, I will require it of him.
Tension rise and temper starts to boil as Tae Yong feels frustrated about this matter. He pushes Hyung in order to stop him talk and out of anguish and frustration Hyung punches him. Tae Yong hits his head on the rail just before he falls into the water. Tae Moo grabs a life buoy to save him but stops at the last minute. Why does that seem to be oddly familiar? The initial reaction vs. the final decision – and it both ends in a bad way.
Serve with Frito's.
I view you all as heroes too. To mourn the ones you love and then forge on in your life without them, is something I do not envy. It takes a great amount of courage. I am so sorry for your loss but impressed by your strength. Thank you for your sacrifices and your continued perseverance. You all deserve a medal, what you have been forced to do is no less than heroic as well. Please know I stand beside you every day in spirit, not just on 9/11 in remembrance. I offer you support and friendship. And I am not just writing this to come across as a caring person. I don’t care if we’re strangers. I would support you, hold your hand and pray for you. I am just an email away.
Hello All, yes shock horror a card from me, I cant believe it has been 6 weeks since I last made a card! wow how life has changed. My beautiful baby girl does not believe is sleeping for more than 15 min at a time, unless she is being held!! so at the moment my production has dramatically decreased and my spending increased, as I seem to spend a lot of time watching create and craft, and just cant resist.
Cricut Sync: 2.1.0.3
Midnight Rider
stale bread crumbs
Our bodies are energy misers; they will grind to a halt far sooner than the body will. Therefore, I make it a daily practice to train my mind to have faith. I take my unwilling mind and instill trust by demonstrating how dynamic and powerful my physical form can be. By testing my limits safely, I can gradually build a rapport with my mind –fitness street cred, if you will –and slowly my mind will release control of my limbs. The substance P decreases; the analgesics speed up.
News has recently emerged that the Jewish Chronicle has been hosting a blog by the British National Party's London mayoral candidate, Carlos Cortiglia.
Kavanagh tried to tease out a contradiction, pointing out that Pinsky had testified that the more the resulting economic activity, the more justification for the subsidy. So why, he asked, wouldn’t it be better to have higher ticket prices?
Notes from screening continue:
But it has become so easy to criticize the life's work of another person. To sit back and take shots at certain things that you presume to know more about. Vencil has been doing it for decades, and no criticism of mine will compare to his life's work. 64 years in Taylor, and someone who hasn't been alive hardly half that time can criticize him? No way.
Wash and pat dry the fish in some kitchen roll then cut them into fingers. Dust each one in flour then dip in the egg. Now coat the fish finger in the bread crumbs.
Om Singh
Well, there's a band called HORRID that plays Swedish death metal since 1990. Maybe they have never written a true masterpiece but they've stayed true since the beginning, and they're still active. Then we have ERODED (not to be confused with the German ERODED), which are really great. Their only two demos have been reprinted on CD and they're currently preparing a full-length record. PROFANAL must be mentioned as well, they're sweadeath-like and Dark Descent itself has just released their brand new split 7"! Furthermore, there are of course other killer, non-swedeath bands out there in Italy, but the main problem is not the lack of bands. The problem is, indeed, the organization and support a scene should have to be healthy.
Patrizio said that one of the techniques women should take advantage of is oocyte (egg) freezing, which appears to be the best strategy for women who want to postpone motherhood but really care about having a child with their own genetic material. Alternative options such as egg donation, which leads to the highest pregnancy rates reported for any ART method, are also available.
Once upon a time handwriting was an art-form, taught and practiced in schools with a rigor that was borderline obsessive. Friends, of my generation, who attended Catholic schools tell tales of strict ruler-bearing nuns who would not hesitate to rap them on the knuckles for illegible penmanship.
Lovely round casserole dish...love that pattern! Came very close to buying this, but Ed spotted me from across the room and shook his head.
Now, it turns out that those CIA interrogators played a critical role in the killing of Osama bin Laden, which the president has rightly called “the most significant achievement to date in our nation’s effort to defeat al-Qaida.”
“HE TOOK MY BIBLE! Dad, dad, daddy, daaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaad!”
What I’m trying to tell you, I guess, is that House has significantly influenced my life. When it airs its last episode in a month, I will feel a loss, like I have lost a great friend. From House, I have learned the biology and the medicine, but I have forced myself to go the step further and to teach myself. I have learned about bedside manner– both good and bad– and I have learned about hospital life in general. I’ve learned that in moderation, it probably is a good thing to defy your boss’s orders if you disagree with them. I have learned that what is right is not always moral, and what is moral is not always right. I have learned that even doctors make mistakes, and that sometimes, no matter how good a doctor is, no matter how soon (or not) they diagnose a patient correctly, sometimes people will die, and there’s nothing you can do about that. And that is ok, it’s part of the job.
But, then again, maybe Cyclops is exactly what huge numbers of people really need and want, and its just that I haven't met any of them yet...
THat's when I realized this situation was far from under control. The bathroom is crowded, there's a line of moms waiting to change their children's diapers, and I am stuck. I have no hope of getting out of there anytime soon. So I just mentally accept that this is my opportunity to be the parent all the other parents look at and think, 'gosh, I'm glad that's not me. How embarassing for her'. I start pulling off all the soiled clothing and thinking what am I going to do? I don't have more clothes...until I realized I DID! I had her PJ's with me (because she typically will fall asleep on the 20 minute drive home and hello, toddler already asleep, why wake her up? Just bring PJ's!). But if I didn't, I would've had to have left the bathroom with baby in diaper (and aren't I thankful that at least I still bring like 2 or 3 extra diapers with me incase something like this happens? But no clothes anymore.) and walk her down to main street and pay way too much for a micky onesie for her to wear home. But the PJ's saved it. And I mean those clothes were COVERED in Poop. I couldn't even rinse them out because it would've involved getting them soaked (and remember the super busy bathroom and super cold temperatures)
Surrogacy may be useful where a woman is unable to bear a child, due to severe pelvic disease or she has had a hysterectomy or because she has medical problems (e.g. heart or kidney disease) and pregnancy may seriously threaten her life or health.
In the wake of the longest government shutdown in over a decade, questions about the budget loom on the horizon.
There was a rare fish called Cassoorwa, which hath in each eye two sights, and as it swimmeth it beareth the lower sights within the water, and the other above…
Last but far, far from least is my garden flower par excellence, cosmos bipinnatus.
Miracle: A beneficial event brought about by divine intervention, such as finding lost keys or surviving a handcart expedition despite the poor judgment and planning of leaders. Miracles occur because of the faith of the recipient, unless the miracle isn’t granted, in which case it is God’s will.
Prior to any shoot, I visualize my images. I do not set up a repetoire, but I think of the images that I definitely want to get. So, in light of the fact that we were going to be on a cruise ship, on the ocean, in beautiful Long Beach, I imagined some beautiful pictures OUTSIDE and great natural lighting inside. I am not a wedding photographer, so I was especially mindful of mentally preparing for this as I wanted these pictures to be perfect for my friend. I had all kinds of wonderful images . . . in mind.
Wait until you see the full reveal of this set on May 9th! These fun and summery strawberries are going to be at the top of your list for creating awesome cards.
to the skin, so that
shaving yet, including me, Don looked like he may have
I joined Planet Fitness in January and I’ve been trying to make it there twice a week, to spend gradually increasing spells on the elliptical. I like the elliptical. It’s not as hollowing and jagged as running, and I still manage to work up a sweat. Ace of Base and Ke$ha keep me company, and I feel utterly satisfied when I get home.
Jeez-Louise, people! During my last post - concerning the very vital, very riveting topic of Nude People Dancing - I received 7 new followers and 28 comments.
Yes, here is yet another Buddy Fite posting, a guitarist with very few recordings but a great sound. I've become a bit focused on collecting all of his meager number of LP's so I had to find this album, even though I knew that 6 of the 9 tracks were repeats of tracks from other albums. As noted earlier on this site, from what I can tell, Buddy only has six LP's as a leader, and of those, only one, "Buddy Fite & Friend", is free of any repeat tracks. So I went ahead and ripped the whole album here, even though only three tracks appear to be unique. Right off the bat I was shocked to hear a vocalist anchoring the first tune, "I Feel The Earth Move". I will say that the singer here does a nice job with earthy, David Clayton Thomas type vocals over a nice bluesy/jazz combo setting where Buddy takes a one minute solo in the middle. Nice enough and definitely different from anything I've heard on any of his other albums, but I have to say I was disappointed to hear something that didn't just feature Buddy throughout. With so few recordings to enjoy, I just want to hear the man play his guitar. Moving into the next few tracks on side one we get back to featuring Buddy, but this whole side is pretty different too in that it concentrates on the bluesy side of Buddy. Each of these three songs offers a different accompanist soloing on saxophone, flute and finally a nice organ over spirited scatting. All very nicely done, all very much in a combo setting, but unfortunately there is no mention of the personnel on the cover. In fact, the recording itself is noticeably of relative poor quality with inconsistencies in the integrity of the sound, volume variations at a few moments, etc. Not terrible, but I guess there's a reason why this seems to be the scarcest of the Fite LP's. Then again, as always, there really is some "tasty" guitar playing throughout. Side 2 opens with what made me completely satisfied that I sprung for a considerable sum to acquire this piece of vinyl. The tune is "Love's Been Good To Me" and Buddy's treatment is creative, unique and very pretty. Along with the opening song on side 1 and Satin Doll, this makes up the three unique tunes for this album. Satin Doll is also very nicely done in an up tempo mode. So for anyone else that has become enamored with Buddy's bright and masterful craft work, I hope you'll enjoy this small dose of new material.While each is indeed a hit with me to varying degrees, it just hurts that only three cuts are additive to the collection. But as hoped, the hits outweigh the hurts mightily...enjoy!
Using Spellbinders Rose Creations, place the die cuts, cutting side down on the cutting plate of the Grand Calibur. Then place the base plate upside down on top, and pass the sandwich through the machine.
Conservationists say the trade, which has taken off since 2009, has added to the pressures that have caused Africa's lion populations to crash from about 200 000 in the 1970s to less than 20 000 today. In some range states in West and Central Africa, lions have recently been declared extinct.
We got some quiche from the hot foods section for lunch. We took it back to Danny’s place and ate. Rosario did a pretty good job of eating. By this time, she was tired, so I took off and she most likely crashed.
It bothers me and makes me pause. It makes me wonder how much I'm cheating? What am I cheating on? Do I even think about the ways I cheat - my children of my full, undivided attention, my students of a teacher that is really well-rested and focused, and Husband of a wife who is happy and not exhausted. Yes, I am too a cheater. And I am disturbed.
‘He told a story about the “We Stand United” American flag pins he commissioned for the games, which took place just months after the terror attacks on 9/11′.
I missed a huge milestone last post! :( It was my 100th post! And, I didn't even realize it until today when I signed into my blog and saw that I had 100 posts. This post is 101. So, Happy 100th post (a day late) to me!!!
I’ll skip the technicalities and illustrate with an imaginary example. (However please note that my brain simply is unable to get the hang of Butler English. So, that aspect is mostly missing from the illustration.)
Discs and Pads
to a desk with the names of lovers to be
Another hallucinogen used by wild animals is the African plant iboga (Tabernanthe iboga). It has been reported from Gabon and the Congo that boars, porcupines, gorillas and mandrills will dig up and eat the powerfully hallucinogenic roots.
The study proposes the use of game-based interventions to improve patent management (awareness, collaboration, strategy). A very interesting and welcome contribution to IP management in a undervalued area of academic research in Europe.
Throughout the weekend at the race track, there are a couple autograph sessions scheduled for fans to meet their favorite drivers and get a signature! Those special sessions are listed here and also in the event program (if you get one that is!)
I use art as my means to get rid of stress. I journal to help work out issues. I create other art to give myself the feeling of accomplishment and self-worth. I try to make my art both crazy and happy just to make anyone who sees it smile.
Oops - there's a little more work to do on the church. The blue applique needs to be stitched down.
While we were in CA we spent a day in San Francisco. I haven't been there since my senior year in high school when I went with my art history group. Last time it was shortly after 9/11 and we weren't allowed near the Golden Gate Bridge- so that was a must for me this trip. It was pretty incredible up close. We also went to Pier 39 and Golden Gate Park (not quite what we expected, but not too bad). Jen and I left the sleeping girls with her friend so we could go see the Hunger Games later that night.
usually because I know that no matter where I go, there's a Walmart near & I can run & pick something up... from shampoo, to make up, to flip flops...
I also bought a double layer tank for the final sale price of $10.97. It has the inside tank a little closer fit to the body, and the outside tank loose and flowy (ie - didn't hug every lump) (ie - very good camouflage) that I am hoping to be able to wear to another NIA class.
HP) Intelligence, thought, open mindedness.
Correct me if I'm wrong, but it's two things: 1. a free app to make your crappy cell phone photos look vintagey and 2. a visually-based social network
The first card uses the Crafty secrets bird postcard stamp with brayer way back here in this post with Big and Juicy Stamp Pad (Hydrangea) and Iridescent medium,(I dropped this on with an eye dropper in the middle of the brayering the ink pad colours) to give it that sheen..so used purple end for this one.
it would be utterly scorned.”
“On Tuesday evenings, my wife and I facilitate a divorce group that helps those who are going through a divorce or have been divorced. One of the most common topics of interest revolves around where one should look for a potential mate. This seems to be of interest not only to the recently divorced …”
Bear will be losing two days of school and the side effects are muscle aches and headaches, but as he said, probably nothing compared to what this woman is going through.
All performances are held at The Writer’s Center: 4508 Walsh Street, Bethesda, MD 20815. There is ample parking across the street (free on weekends), and the theatre is just blocks away from the Bethesda Metro Station on the red line.
Meany things else are
Sylvia Day creates a steamy novel in The Stranger I Married.
Q. Does the problem lie in who uses the humanitarian label?
I believe that a sinner justified by God stands on much firmer ground than a righteous man justified by his works; if such a person existed. How could you ever be sure if you had done enough good works? Our own judgement is too fallible to rely upon. On the other hand, when God Himself justifies, and the Holy Spirit bears witness by giving us peace with God, by faith we know that the matter is sure and settled, and we know that we are secure in God’s Hands. Consider this from the writings of Charles H. Spurgeon:
Corsica, Sardinia & Sicily. These 3 islands hold some incredible roads that like Spain have riders consistently rating as some of the best riding to be found anywhere. I wanted to visit Sicily long before finding out it was a good ride.
Innovation in Action
“There is some truth in that, you know.”
The Applications of iPhones in Watches
Perhaps the best way to think of it is this. I asked you just now to imagine those two books, and probably most of you did. That is, you made an act of imagination and as a result you had a mental picture. Quite obviously your act of imagining was the cause and the mental picture the result. But that does not mean that you first did the imagining and then got the picture. The moment you did it, the picture was there. Your will was keeping the picture before you all the time. Yet that act of will and the picture began at exactly the same moment and ended at the same moment. If there were a Being who had always existed and had always been imagining one thing, his act would always have been producing a mental picture; but the picture would be just as eternal as the act.
enjoy immensely meeting the needs of our friends and family. I love
I wondered how long I could endure empty and meaningless work. And what if I should haul off and lose my temper?
They don't allow jeans in the restaurant dining room."
Favorite Place Name? Aaaaand I just got tired of these questions. Good thing that was the last one.
Marley wondered if she knew what her son did for a living? Surely she could not approve of it if she did. Looking at her with a sideways glance the thought occurred to him that what he was seeing was some thin veneer of a facade and right underneath its surface was Ma Barker. Guiding her son and his criminal empire from the shadows and safety of her subtle, innocuous position. Suddenly she was standing next to him with another slice of pizza and refilling his glass of soda with such a warm and obviously caring smile that Marley flushed at what he had been thinking. Returning the smile he thanked her and silently cussed the Heights for making him so cynical.
These question though insignificant to some but are relativity important in terms of parenting and specially parenting a male child by a hard core feminist or at least feminist sympathizer . The pink male population might give it a pass by not getting involved in order to get married to “set” of women who “looks beautifully right” but has a underlining agenda for a matriarchy dominated society is just ridiculous. Using young boys as guinea pigs to “realize” their dreams by such “beautiful women” is equally ridiculous.
PORSCHE - Piece Of Rusty Scrap, Cost Highly Expensive
I made a quick trip to the thrift store last week, where I scored a little jacket, little jeans, little shoes and little gloves all for $11. To my surprise, the jacket had a small name tag area on the inside, where Dustin got his name...
Immediacy is the delicate and intimate connection between the story and the reader – if a writer lacks immediacy within the writing, then the reader might not be able to emotionally connect with the characters or the narrative, and if that happens, the reader is unlikely to enjoy the story/novel.
Pondering different options for building an all-inclusive ecumenical LGBTQ online community. If I took the time to set up some kind of forum or page where (1) groups of the same beliefs can congregate and (2) where groups of all beliefs can interact in a safe debate-free environment, would anyone be interested in this?
Here I am, odd again.
In an earlier issue ofFoundations (No 36, pp 43-47) I reviewed the Evangelical Alliance book, Together We Stand, and commented briefly on chapter 10, The Futures of Evangelicalism. The very fact that the two authors, Clive Calver and Rob Warner, felt it necessary to use the plural, Futures, shows how tentative all such speculation must be. I will now note more fully the (alliterated) sub-headings oftheir chapter. Retaining the status quo, is what they regard as an increasingly unlikely prospect Reassimilation is considered a danger if senior evangelicals become increasingly distanced from one another as their energies are poured into their denominational duties. Reform is the hope that evangelicals will act to reform the existing and historic denominations. Refragmentaion is a real but disastrous prospect, should evangelicals choose the easy and yet palpably absurd option of devoting their energies to warring with one another. Remnant is how the writers speculate that the corrosion of evangelical convictions of the majority would leave a remnant of the faithful
Last but not least, is this fabulous desk makeover from Julia at 551 East Furniture Design. The color is amazing... which is the whole point! Her inspiration---peacocks of course! To learn the paint color specs and see the transformation, stop over at...
Cool and sweeten Ohio’s villages with leaves fluttering in the
The Musée Carnevalet ‘Fait Sa Révolution’
That is Los Angeles Rams great Rosie Grier whom Jim is on the verge of shooting above. Grier is a voodoo influenced zombie named Tiny John. Jim does shoot him, but it does no good, and Tiny John throws Jim around like a rag doll. The scene is oe of the few times in the series they do not bother to hide Robert Conrad’s short 5’ 8” stature.
Kale*
I came to Milano because I have a burning desire to serve my community of Harlem in particular and urban black neighborhoods in general. I thought that at Milano, I would find a community of aspiring policy makers and scholars actively engaged in urban policy matters that directly impact urban communities of color. Sadly, this is not the case. This is not to say that Milano is completely devoid of any discussion of urban communities of color, but there is not the level of emphasis I would like to see in a program that is supposed to offer an alternative to Columbia’s SIPA and NYU’s Wagner. We only have a couple of courses that directly address issues of race, and both of them, to my knowledge, are taught by one professor – Darrick Hamilton. I think Leigh Graham’s classes may also address issues of race, but her Economic Development course wasn’t offered this semester and she’s off to another university next fall. Karen Merson has led the Making a Difference course, but my understanding is that the course is more of a general question-your-assumptions survey of oppression.
“We were friends. She was such a big-hearted woman,” he finally said.
Shit, most of the people I know are on second and third marriages...Dad....lol
Happiness was easily built back then. Or at least from my perspective it appeared as though it didn't take much to build hope.
Hot Pursuit: Murder in Mississippi by Stacia Deutsch and Rhody Cohon with illustrations by Craig Orback
Papers: Bazill- vanilla and green cardstock, Canson 300 g watercolorpaper,
Alan and I have enjoyed making up vaguely ethnic alliterative nicknames for baseball players of Jewish or Canadian descent. We like these, because really those are the last 2 frontiers in terms of baseball ethnicity, and literally every time a player from one of those groups excels, his heritage is mentioned.
Mary's life in the village is predictable. The Sisterhood, the Guardians, and the Guild keep the secrets and protect the village. People follow the rules, whether it's staying away from the Fence or marrying the person you should, not the person you want. When Mary loses her parents and her family, she begins to ask questions and to want more than to love or be loved. Before she can figure out the answers, the Unconsecrated threaten to overrun the village.
Last time, I had promised to tell you about the new furniture and the bunnies. This is the new sectional. It's about twice the size as the one we saw in the store. Takes up the whole living room.
On home visits, I always take a cup of tea if offered. It is in the giving and receiving of hospitality that we build trust, and anyway, the mugs in the office are far more disgusting than anything in anyone’s kitchen.
The bottom line is that the shadow can be three to four times as long as the actual object. All it takes is for the light to be at just the right angle. Low-aiming light gives a long shadow and makes for an illusion of size.
He also owns a boat that is in a bit of disrepair.
I love me some child prodigy scripts! Bobby Fischer is one of the best first halves of a movie that eventually turned sucky I’ve ever seen. Right up there with The Beach.
The friend pointed out, that for almost two years we lived about an hour’s drive apart, and we saw each other quite often, but we had the great sense to know when to leave each other alone and give one another space. We knew that there were some weekends the other person just wanted to do their own thing.
Mendocino Black Hawk Stout – NY & CA – 5.2% ABV
I'll let them think this is true
I hadn’t talked to this guy, pretty much ever, possibly once or twice. I’ve known who he was for about seven or eight years, he wasn’t in my life for a while, but he goes to my college now. I really do hope I’m able to talk to him at some point, preferably in a calm, quiet room, but this happenstance just got me thinking… This is what I have been putting God through basically since I got back from New York. I hear the craziness screaming in my ear, “Megan!” and I turn towards it instead of God. God, of course, will never leave me behind, but the craziness of those thirty seconds or so just really imprinted on my heart what my busyness has been toward God. I know He’s been trying to tell me something, but I keep allowing myself to get distracted by everything but Him.
Your Excellency:
Right before my kitchen became unusable, The Gentleman Friend and I made this tasty dish. I don’t have a photo of my version of it, but here’s the one from the blog, Tasty Tidbits, I got the recipe from:
Her much beloved wings
The Red Carpet ritual for The Brits had one of the most unappealing backdrops imaginable: the urban wasteland of part of Earl's Court.
01 Echano
You've reached Kari Marie's blog.
Unless you can know, when unpraised by his breath,
The Latin Mass DVD is available at www.stjosephsmedia.net or amazon.com. The cost is $20 plus shipping and includes the Mass missal. Or send a check for $23 to St. Joseph’s Media, P.O. Box 186, Wayne, MI 48184.
This is the first film by Kevin Smith and it introduced us to the View Askew Universe. Smith has come a long way since this was released, but this is still a very good film.
This is all for the sake of keeping her kidneys healthy. Without healthy kidneys, you can't grow and develop, and as a type one diabetic...again, we need strong, healthy, kidneys. She already has a lot of strikes against her.
Very easy.
It goes well with food--as of course many Belgian ales do and have done for centuries. It was a nice pairing with both the tangy tandoori chicken, which it complemented, and the bitter/sour asparagus, which it contrasted. The salad--eh, it was fine. But hey, two out of three's good.
File size : 1 024 MiB
A former world class steeplechaser who represented the United States internationally for several years and set an American record in the event back in 1983. As an athlete Marsh was a 10 time national steeplechase champion. Since then he has become a businessman and is co-founder and Executive Vice President of MovaVie – a multilevel marketing company that sells “juice products featuring an exclusive Açai berry juice blend”.
When I think about this combination, I think most writers must be a combination of these three. Obviously, we're Amity, as we love the arts. We are Candor as we search for the truth, and Erudite as we seek and use knowledge. I guess the stories we tell and how we choose to tell them is influenced by which of the 3 shine brightest in us, and if any of the other factions are thrown into the mix as well.
Also, for those who have more time or desire a more in-depth astrological look at May 2012, here’s a Carl Boudreau video I originally found on Shift Frequency. As Gillian describes it: “An amazing month. Tons of mutable energy, several six-pointed stars – including two different kinds, a five pointed star and a solar eclipse. A huge, overwhelming turning point of a month. Do not expect clarity. But you can expect a lot of help. As weird and wild and crazy as the vibes are, May is loaded with positive synchronicity.” The 39 minutes reveals all sorts of unusual layers in what looks to be a highly charged month on many levels:
I left Gunter and his team to it as I exited past the gift shop full of tacky skull trinkets.
By finding the cure in a drawer,
I recently got to try some Farm Rich Mozzarella Bites. Farm Rich offers a wide selection of easy to make snacks and I received a coupon to try one of their products for free! I picked the Mozzarella Bites because I love cheese sticks! Let me say that these bites did not disappoint!
The world's deadliest CIA operatives, FDR Foster (Pine) and Tuck (Hardy) are inseparable partners and best friends until they fall for the same woman (Witherspoon). Having once helped bring down entire enemy nations, they are now employing their incomparable skills and an endless array of high-tech gadgetry against their greatest nemesis – each other.
We found him slumped against a wall like a little siesta-ing Mexican child and proceeded to pick him up and try and carry him off. Now, I mentioned earlier that time gets sketchy, and from here on out, it gets really bad.
Heart and stroke has affected my mother's side of the family tremendously. I don't know if you remember but my brother passed away a year and half ago with heart failure at the age of 61.
I think you CAN judge a book by it’s cover. Isn’t that the point of the cover? The declaration that you CAN’T judge a book by it’s cover has always been a confusing one for me. We all have a story to tell and our covers reveal to the world exactly what we want others to judge us by. The way we decorate, or not decorate, ourselves each morning as we leave the house and go out into the world speaks volumes about who we are and even where we are going.
In other new tonight I got my butt kicked in Candyland in record time. Jacob finished in about 10 turns and his brother wasn’t too far behind him.
D Rosier
Juxtapose against that the conduct of the teachers’ unions, who are now perceived as selfish, grasping, unprincipled. The pension obligations that face many states (e.g., California, Illinois, New York, Ohio and others) are not the fault of the average Joe. They are now being perceived as the result of years and years of behind the scenes lobbying by the public “servants”, principally including the teachers. Is it any wonder Michelle Rhee’s logic captured so much attention and adulation and the UFT and the NEA so much opprobrium?
When you are ready, slowly tighten the valve bolt until you hear air flow into the air adaptor, then tighten a little more to make sure the connection is secure. Don't over-tighten. Listen very carefully for air escaping. You should have heard air flow into the air adaptor, but that is quick and you should not hear air escaping anywhere else. Press the trigger on top of the air gripp a few times to make sure that air is flowing properly.
14And deceiveth them that dwell on the earth by the means of those miracles which he had power to do in the sight of the beast; saying to them that dwell on the earth, that they should make an image to the beast, which had the wound by a sword, and did live.
between letters and numbers,
Norwegian anti-Islamic fanatic Anders Behring Breivik told a court on Thursday that he used computer games to prepare for his attacks, once spending an entire year isolated from society playing a
When Chickie was three we also bought windows, windows so big that a grown man could stand in them without stooping. The light streamed through these windows into every room of the old house, some rooms with double and triple windows casting sunbeams and creating shadows that shifted and changed as the day faded to night.
When I’m kicked, I tend to kick back twice as hard, I have a bite and a backbone that is coming out more and more. Stubbornly I cling to what stability I have, I keep myself upright and keep going because there is no other choice.
There are those who teach only
Then it's run back to the airport, grab a flight to Chicago, because that's where my Air India flight is leaving from on Wednesday.
"A" wrote a poem and each part connected to one of the pictures she included. I love that she expressed that this woman was more than an "In-law". She also said how proud she was to be "D's" wife. What a wonderful thing for any wife to say. You can see why we love them!
It was such a great way to wake up today that they have found and released the final recordings of one of my musical heroes – Louis Armstrong. At a concert given to the National Press Club in January of 1971, of which original pressings were limited to 300. The release’s liner notes included 3 dozen of Satchmo’s favorite recipes, including white beans and ham hocks, gumbo, po-boys and Louisiana caviar, an eggplant dish. From the genius who brought us “Struttin’ with some Barbecue.”
The alleged robbery, including racist taunts, drew a social media pledge from former foreign affairs minister Kevin Rudd and led to emergency talks at Sydney’s Chinese consulate general.
Ivy- Ivy gets a call from Sonya saying that she knows the art on her walls was Ivy’s designs and she wants to have a talk with her later. Ivy and Diego go to Sonya’s gallery and Sonya tells them their graffiti is beautiful. She also tells them she wants them to do a show at her gallery or she’ll tell the cops about the graffiti. Diego is still being a hipster and doesn’t want to sell out his “art”, and Ivy gets sick of it and leaves. Ivy also wants validation of her relationship with Diego, but he doesn’t want to define their relationship. After Ivy tries to salvage Annie’s bag business at the festival, Diego comes by. Ivy says she overreacted and Diego says he’s still trying to figure out them dating. He asks her to be his girlfriend. She says yes. They ride a ferris wheel. Ugh.
Most Chinese make the mistake of misreading the surface quiescence of the Malay grassroots as a tolerance of the DAP push and push and push. They appear ignorant of the Malay proverb ‘air tenang jangan disangka tiada buaya’.
Rule#1: Put the rules on your blog.
Yesterday was the Virgin London Marathon and it was from cheering point at mile 22 that I can say that the female runner in the Hook Norton Bottle was quite cheerfully out running the male London Pride Bottle. This year's third place was held by the lady in the Adnams Bottle but well done for a hard race in the sunshine and wind!
- I say: Why is it still raining? Does it really rain that much?
"Your time will come, keep going, persevere!"
Art thou elated ?
And I would like to direct Mr Amis to authors like Philip Pullman, Garth Nix and Diane Duane. These consistently write fiction that NEVER talk down to children - in fact, Philip Pullman deals with complicated physics theories and a discussion on the nature of God!
The Hollywood pair have claimed that Digital Projection, Inc. and Beyond Audio have used their likeness and trademarks to sell their projectors and entertainment systems, says The Hollywood Reporter.
I’ve been having some thoughts about communication after watching this TV drama revolving around the lives of married couples in my country, and can’t help relating some of the scenes to people around me – problems between the folks, between friends and with myself.
Xu Guan blinked his eyes open. His mind worked slowly and unsteadily to recall recent events. The cool caress of industrial tile pawed at his cheek as he tried to draw his knees up to his chest. Xu Guan blinked again trying to bring his surroundings into focus.
8. Ethical investing: In a manner akin to selective purchasing ordinances, if you are part of an organization that has an investment portfolio, such as a pension plan or university endowment, try to get investment guidelines implemented that forbid the purchase of the stocks and bonds of unethical companies. (These are known as “negative screens.” There are also positive screens, where investors identify ethical companies for support.) The types of guidelines that have been implemented so far preclude investments in companies which:
6 ounces fresh raspberries, rinsed
Oh, the raptures, the joys, the fantastical splendor.
Around the seventh month of my pregnancy, my marriage had hit a snag. I was trying my best to hold myself together and be an attentive wife and loving friend, but the toil involved in the beauty of carrying a child was weighing me down (no pun intended). I felt hopelessly frustrated, unsupported, and misunderstood most of the time. I couldn’t even discern my legitimate complaints from my crazy estrogen-laden ones. I was a wreck, and my husband was getting the brunt of it.
This is pretty straightforward, save for the fact that I prefer a gas stove to a meths stove when I’m cycling as my diet can be more varied than dehydrated backpacker food. I tend to buy my food on the road every day and get a bit more creative due to the wider variety of ingredients on offer. Having a stove that you can adjust is a great help when softening onions and garlic!
The magazine, which is planning to publish only three images, said that in addition to the crimes the men were on trial for there are “also entire collections of pictures of other victims that some of the defendants were keeping”.
calling us to awaken
of Deadly Legacy. It's the Dirty Thirties projected forward. The City is surrounded by shantytowns built out of the refuse of our disposable economy. CSI-like forensic labs are a reality. Swing-era styles are the latest retro-chic and abayas and veils are commonly worn on the streets, regardless of religion,
granted to the state’s police, all in order to make life in Arizona
The conference will be taking place in the School of Nursing at DCU, directly beside the main campus entrance on Collins Avenue:
It is really easy and I shall explain how you can achieve it in a few easy to follow steps -
SO, the fall birthdays continue! I shared George's card with you last time, and today I want to show you Jan's and Sue's cards. (This is your SECOND SPOILER ALERT, Sue and Jan!! Go watch some puppy videos or something!)
Happy new year to everyone!!!
After the 10-minute protest, the Perkasa members proceeded on their motorcycles to Komtar and continued to strew Lim’s posters along their way.
Based on these results, it can be anticipated that an EMP will trigger moderate to severe traffic congestion in metropolitan areas. The traffic congestion may be exacerbated by the panic reactions possibly attendant to an EMP attack. None of the data predict or suggest life threatening conditions; conflicting green lights did not occur during the tests. All the observed effects would cause less traffic disruption than would a power outage, which results in no working traffic lights.
Pulled out his phone and showed me.
I interrupt my regular life post, to bring you breaking shoe news.
I no longer cry everyday. I do feel sad everyday.
While I have a lot of respect for that agency, I think I ended up in the best place for me. I'm sure either way would have worked out fine.
In one dark corner, Xu Guan found a double-barrel shotgun. He was unfamiliar with this style of weapon so he hefted it carefully. Rust covered the barrels and action. The stock, formed of what was once beautifully-grained wood, was now dented and scratched. Xu Guan recognized the trigger but was unsure of the purpose of the lever on the top of the gun’s action. He pressed the lever to the side and the old gun’s break action opened a fraction of an inch. Xu Guan forced the action open farther and peered down the bore of the barrels. Much like the gun’s exterior, the bores were rusty and pitted.
I told Jimmy he was lucky to have that house with a monster in the front yard. What about the Loch Ness monster? Jimmy Page thinks it exists. I wondered if it could find enough to eat, and thought this unlikely–it’s not the improbability but the upkeep on monsters that worries me. Did Aleister Crowley have opinions on the subject? He apparently had not expressed himself....We talked about Wilhelm Reich’s orgone accumulator, and I showed him plans for making this device, which were passed along to me by Reich’s daughter. Basically the device is very simple, consisting of iron or steel wool on the inside and organic material on the outside. I think this was highly important discovery. Recently a scientist with the National Aeronautics and Space Administration announced an “electrical cell” theory of cancer that is almost identical to Reich’s cancer theory put forth 25 years ago. He does not acknowledge any indebtedness to Reich. I showed Jimmy the orgone box I have here, and we agreed that orgone accumulators in pyramid form and/or using magnetized iron could be much more powerful.Yes, it's all like that. Read the whole thing.
But the one thing I know now
The Nanny (Melissa Nathan)
"seven yards of new stamped linen, a purple and flower stripe", p 222
I am stronger than you thought
For a full list of precautions for children, teenagers and adults, read the manufacturer product inserts and get more information about how to recognize a vaccine reaction at www.NVIC.org. Find out whether the pertussis vaccine your doctor is recommending for your child has been studied for safety and effectiveness when given at the same time as other vaccines. For example, many pertussis vaccines have not been studied in clinical trials when a flu shot is given at the same time.
4. Please Don't Leave Me (Domino) 2:55
If you are not testing, then how would you like to test your apps if given the opportunity?
(72) Just as the borrowing of material from other writers was not frowned on in earlier ages as it is today (we call it plagiarism and consider it a grace fault), so may have been the device of claiming some notable person from the past as author of one’s own work.
Use 2 minced garlic cloves instead of garlic powder for the bread slices
Jenn: Is there a website you'd like to let the readers know about?
Just wanted to let you know that we have now moved the site over to Preston Bailey.com. The new link is: http://www.prestonbailey.com/inspiration/blog/
Sepawi is also Chairman and major shareholder of the construction giant Naim Cendara (in receipt of major government contracts), Chairman and major shareholder of Ta Ann one of the largest plantation and logging companies (given huge lands by Taib), Chairman and major shareholder of Sarawak Plantation Bhd (in receipt of vast plantation licences). Crucially, he is also as Treasurer of PBB (putting him in charge of all the money in the chief political party). Then there are all the key associations representing people’s interests that Sepawi is also Chairman of, such as the Oil Palm Plantation Owners Association. He is also Chairman of the Board of Sarawak Enterprise. The list continues.
Here are some survival tips for you smarties. Good luck.
Israel will also continue to have conventional military superiority over Iran and the rest of the region. The Israeli Defence Forces (IDF) have a demonstrated qualitative edge over all its potential adversaries in the region, including Iran. The Israeli Air Force has the capability to penetrate air-defence systems with virtual impunity, as it demonstrated in 2007 when it destroyed Syria’s nascent nuclear capability. The IDF’s intelligence and electronic-warfare capabilities are vastly superior to those of any potential rivals in the region.
Our most memorable and horrible battles were around the time I got engaged, and she said some pretty hurtful things (including a Facebook status in poor taste when I tried to involve her in the process of selecting my wedding dress). We kept a distance from each other for over a year prior.
That was just a little side thought from my care to not imply logical levels in this analogy.
Andy Duncan
Pratyush: – She is fine and is working for an HR consultancy after her studies.
Happy Everything people... much love to you all
When Bruce and I went to Appleby’s one early Friday at 50G (football building at Mt. SAC) to converse and do our interview (see full storyHERE), I didn’t know what to expect from a large 6-foot-4-inch 235-pound beast.
Discs of glass
Unwittingly discovering the answer to this mystery, Bobby finds out that China Blue is actually Joanna Crane, a nondescript fashion designer. Hired by the owner of the women's sportswear company she works for to spy on her (the owner thinks she is selling patterns to the competition), Bobby follows Joanna to her swanky apartment. Moments later, Joanna emerges wearing a raincoat and a platinum blonde wig, and proceeds to get into a cab, which takes her to the heart of the city's squalid underbelly. Filming her from the relative safety of his car and listening to her conversations from the fire escape located outside her hotel window, Bobby seems transfixed by Joanna's transformation from a drab yuppie to a vibrant sex fiend.
Thank you for fluttering on by today! You make me sparkle. :o)
3, Whilst the mousse is cooling, make the crêpes by gently heating a non stick frying pan and wiping it with a little melted butter on a piece of kitchen towel. Beat the eggs, milk and water together in a mixing bowl and sift in the flour. Whisk until you have a smooth, lumpless batter.
It might be best if Miley Cyrus stays out of the kitchen. Late Monday night she sliced her finger while cooking and was rushed to the hospital. Photographers were all over the incident, immediately following her there.
I call this the "score and scoop" method. It's easy to do and works really well.
In order to maintain our standard of living, we are forced to TAKE from the Earth’s resources and if you buy products from the Pacific Rim and China, you take from the bodies and time from the people who are forced to work in sweat shops or manufacturing. In SHARING SELF EXPRESSION the products rendered will be built out of one’s own expression and natural talents. If you like constructing tennis shoes, you do that using your own creative powers to share with everyone.
As for Elvis books to avoid, there’s actually a lot of them. Many Elvis books do little to advance any understanding or analysis of Elvis.
His hanging face, like a devil's sick of sin;
I keep being told that in the life of a SB child the first year is the hardest. SO I just keep counting down. I would do just about anything for my kids but we are in need of a break. I just want things to level out and be able to breathe. Little did I know it was coming very soon. I just didn't know it would come in the form it did.
I don’t want to hear about your periods!!!! And I don’t care about some girl who was at your school.
I don’t know anyone who likes tax increases, but having bad schools would cost our community a lot more than the $400/year per household if our school system collapses.
What few survivors remained after this burning war trod a world inhospitable to life. They turned inward, and dug deep into the bowels of the earth, where fires burned eternal, and here they held onto a pathetic simulacrum of their former lives, rooting out a meager existence. Bent by the weight of destruction above, bowed by the cloistering caverns of their new life, and forever peering into the dangerous darkness that bound them, the survivors struggled for many long generations before feeling the diminished caress of the faded sun on their faces. When they emerged at last into the light of day, the world was an unrecognizable, inhospitable red desert, with barely enough air to fill the lungs, and a dark red sun blazing above. It was infinitely better than the tunnels they left.
I had to leave during the second half to see a friend who told me tobacco companies had been discovered putting sugar in their cigarettes to make them more addictive.
Ann Fahl
Synopsis: Fifteen year old Henning is walking into Stockholm. The city lies before him with all its possibilities. The city however doesn’t quite live up to its promises.
Artist Larry Quach put together a Mario-themed Super Wedding Invitations for his friends Esther and Ryan, with cartridge-shaped invitations and a question block box full of wedding favors.
Forgive the graphic analogy but if you don’t ground your energy it’s a bit like taking in more and more food or using a cleansing diet without ever going to the toilet! This becomes even more necessary if you are engaging in personal growth or spiritual practices or are experiencing spontaneous spiritual emergence because it stirs up your energy.
The base is basic black. The designer paper is from Stampin Up and is layered on white card stock. The piano keys I got off the internet and layered on white. Added some musical note brads, flowers with black flower brads and and shimmery bow.
I know, it's not Thursday so I had to make up a new word because I'm so fankful for my mama! She's been living with us for several months and I was able to take care of her for a bit after she got her bionic knee but now she's taking care of me because I become catatonic after about 5:30pm.
Rating: (6) (19)
Stanley Greene has photographed in the former Soviet Union, Central America, Asia and the Middle East. His work has appeared in publications including Newsweek, The New York Times Magazine, Stern and Paris Match. He has won various World Press Awards and in 2004 the W. Eugene Smith Award. Open Wound: Chechnya 1994-2003was published in 2004 and his book Black Passport in 2009. Greene is one of the founders of the Amsterdam-based international photo agency NOOR.
it doesn’t rain
Then we have our weekly necessary “informercial”. This week it’s Multigrain Peanut Butter Cheerios. I actually didn’t know these existed. I’ve always wished that they didn’t sweeten the Multigrain Cheerios and now this? I love peanut butter though. I may have to give them a try.
Dr. Hilde L. Mosse was one of the founder's (with Wertham) of the LaFargue Clinic in Harlem. Her background is a perfect explanation for her views on children and violence. From a rich and prominent German Jewish family, her exposure to the horrors of the Nazi's rise to power, causing her family's flight from Germany, is a fascinating story that can be read here:
Let’s look at the Message Paraphrase of Philippians 4:12…Paul is saying he’s learned to be happy in the different seasons and circumstances.
Some of my Fireman buddies and I wanted to send this special “Happy Birthday” photo out to my wife and my dear Mother-in-Law.
I'm heading off to Chicago in a month. (Jesus)
Wouldn’t we rather read about flawed humans, people who make mistakes but who still manage to redeem themselves or a portion of their lives? Don’t we want bold characters who are different from us, who speak their minds—even when fearful of consequences—who press ahead despite fear and anxiety and feelings of worthlessness?
I just saw the news late last week about a RAF P-40 dating from 1942 that was found in the Egyptian Desert in a remarkable state of preservation. I have seen it referred to as either a "Kittyhawk" or "Warhawk" variant - I'll have to do a little more research to see which one was sold to the RAF. The P-40 had its greatest fame as the aircraft used by the "Flying Tigers" American Volunteer Group that flew for the Nationalist Chinese government in 1941. This find immediately reminded me of the story of the "Lady Be Good" a USAAF B-24 that was found in similar circumstances in the Libyan Desert in the late 1950s. That was a big news story when I was a kid, and I remember seeing big photo-spreads on it in Life magazine. I also remember a special TV dramatization about it on "Armstrong Circle Theater." My parents let me stay up late to watch it. Is anybody else here old enough to remember Douglas Edwards and "Armstrong Circle Theater?" As many organizations as there are these days actively looking for recoverable crashed WWII warbirds, I would be surprised if this doesn't set off an exploration rush in the Sahara. Especially now that the Kadahfy regime is out in Libya.
Web browsing
Author of many short stories, Pavarti spans genres from Horror and Erotica all the way to Fantasy. Currently Pavarti is hard at work preparing for the release of her upcoming novel Shadow on the Wall, a Muslim Superhero Literary Fiction.
Lower left: carrot; steamed broccoli; pickle; apricot; chocolate chip cookie; smoked Tofurky, Vegan Gourmet monterey jack cheese, lettuce on flax lavash wrap bread.
made by others beings,
Most American audiences are traditionally cool about foreign movies. But IFC executive Debbie DeMontro, who greenlit Bollywood Hero, thinks Americans will enjoy the series because it mixes a little West with its East.
Apologies for not blogging much here lately about my comings and goings. It's been a busy and at the same time a not-so-busy couple of months: I've been taking one of those breaks from writing that you need sometimes - those fallow periods where you let life in (rather than shut it off in order to write) - and blogging seems to have suffered along with the creative stuff.
For whom might I serve as a “Paul” in bringing about reconciliation? Contact through Church.
All right, let’s get back to the debate — the debate now.
1. I know that I have a year. I'm not limited time-wise; whereas, last year, I would've tried to fit all my goofing off into three months of summer vacation, now I know I have a year (or more, depending on what I decide) to do whatever I want.
“Absolutely!” said Colleen DeGregory, who turned out to be the restaurant’s co-owner. “We’re thrilled to have neighborhood folks here.” Even filthy ones.
Coal - for warmth - he nicked a pretend one from my mum's gas fire display.
As many of you will know, today is St George's Day and there was an event in central Nottingham. I got down to the Old Market Square early so I could get a good spot to see the procession that made their way from the Forest.
In the early morning hours of the next day, on Monday May 1, 1961, Michael died of head and internal injuries. He was only seven and a half years old. I recall my mother and I, an evening or two later, visiting the local Chamber’s Funeral home and seeing Michael’s lifeless body in the small satin-lined casket. Wearing a dark suit his hair was neatly combed and rosary beads draped in his hands. In front sat an altar where family and friends of his Catholic faith knelt and said their silent prayers. It was hard for me as a young impressionable boy to deal with the reality, the loss and finality that scene contained. It was my first experience of such a grim and sad occasion that is forever etched in my memory. There were no grief counselors at school in those days, so I was left to my own means to deal with what was a very troubling, personal event. Even today, as I recall the details of those days, it’s always an emotional experience.
Cleaning product sales (I don’t clean so no)
Along with the blog hop, these awesome ladies are also hosting some awesome giveaways (starting Friday)! There are so many fun items being given away, I can't wait! And, I'm very excited that I was able to sponsor one of these fun giveaways. To celebrate MilSpouse Appreciation Day and the launch of our Etsy shop, "Happy Days", I am sponsoring the giveaway for this patriotic knot dress (isn't my little model cute ;)! You can find the details for entering the giveaway at Riding the Roller Coaster, but I'll tell ya, it's SUPER easy :)
What about the defence men and women that dont have any loved ones to miss them. Lets let all of our defence forces know that we care send them a care package this christmas.
After a few days of that, I though I had permanently worn off the tips of my right-hand middle and index fingers! Leather is *not* easy to sew. And I was even using light-weight garment leather.
And here's a text that made me love him even more, but it might make you sick. I'd apologize for sharing it, but I'm not sorry:
Nat Geo Asia Taiwan 04/12/2011 21:00
And here's the award blurb from the Houston SCBWI site:
they offered her no solution or solace
6. Nut Popper #1
To sing first, (to the tap of the war-drum if need be,)
In 1959, the average cost of a new home was about $12,400. Today, one can expect to purchase a new home for at least $267,300.
I've heard it said that, "necessity is the mother of invention." Actually, Plato said, in The Republic, "Necessity, who is the mother of Invention." The idea being that if you need to do something, you learn how to do it, fast. Last week, while I was cooking supper, my daughter ran up the basement stairs and announced, "There's some water down there." My husband happened to be out of town, so I was the one who learned some things pretty quickly. I learned:
To his astonishment, I transfer four large pots, full of murky water, from the stove to the sink, which threatens to collapse.
5. Burn it!
government aimed at provoking changes in Cuba,
548 Fillmore St. between Oak and Fell.
I liked that Monroe creates the characters to become friends first as it was needed to let them take the final plunge into love.
You think I am too independent. I’m not. You are way too dependent. I don’t need to be with someone. I want to be with someone. There’s a huge difference. But for you, they are one of the same. There’s a sad neediness to your having to be a part of a couple. If you were female, you would no doubt be labeled as a desperate stage 5 clinger. So, lucky for you, you are a guy.
Breakfasts will be cereal, eggs, pancakes, etc. I have plenty of all of these items to last at least a month.
I used the cutie pie, little Oh Boy Ian, in this easel card. So you want to win? Here are the details:
Recently, we discussed the Census data that suggests Hispanic enterprises are growing more rapidly than non-minority businesses. Although we laud the fact that the number of Hispanic and other minority-owned businesses have increased, a closer look at the Census numbers might reveal a lesser achievement.
There is no obligation to make a donation - you will be sent the chart whether or not you choose to make a donation, as I appreciate that some people are not in a financial position to do so.
No, not vampire bats. Actual mice-like blood-sucking rodents.
Dr. Marie Bartek’s life has been uneventful as the local veterinarian on Sullivan’s Island, SC, until her ability to see spirits returns after eighteen years. After confiding in her best friend and realizing their interests in the paranormal, they organize a paranormal investigation team called Sullivan’s Island Paranormal Society, SIPS. Marie learns to channel her ability through the help of one of the team members, but not before learning the spirits are trying to warn her about the murders taking place on Sullivan’s Island. Sullivan’s Secret captivates the reader with murder, suspense, and the world of the paranormal.
What a bad loser!
egg
3. My favorite living actor is Morgan Freeman, he played God for a reason!
1/2 cup butter,
Name(s): ULTIMATE PET RESORT
in which he keeps alive that sacred fire, which otherwise might escape from the face of the earth.
While blog hopping yesterday, I lingered over at School Girl Style & browsed around. Have you seen her classroom designs?! Gorgeous!
What she doesn't know is that he has been waiting for her... the enchanting woman who emerged from the shadows of the Great War to save his life."
If you like the plungered made coffee, you can buy a packet of coffee powder.
Today's jewelry is a kind of amazing story. I bought the vintage earrings in Nashville, and then about six months later, found the matching brooch at the Alameda Antiques Fair in California. Spooky!
I find when I read discussions online about leaving money behind it is often assumed we will go back to a barter system or complete anarchy will ensue as looters and hoarders steal and damage what they can, leaving others with nothing. Sure there might be some panic as things shift, resistance to change in natural, but if you look at how the Occupy Wall Street Movement has organised itself amongst all the chaos of police state brutality and have achieved things from the library, catering and camps for large numbers of protesters and homeless, organising peaceful events, to providing the political foundation for serious change in our societal ethos through protest. So I feel confident we will not all regress into the darkest of our animal instincts. Sure there will always be that element to our nature, but if society stops creating monsters through unjust treatment and poverty there will be far fewer problems to deal with in the first place.
And as for the fourth guy in the picture, well, I think you might know him by now, his name’s Ajoy and he has been hanging around these fellows for the past few decades still having a ball. By the way, all of us now live in Sydney and all of us are still cooking!
From your tangerine colours you will need a total of 180 x 3 in squares.
But he had no remorse for killing Hector Juarez, whose naked body he left in the desert near Marana.
It would seem that the freehold in 2, Coronation Street is held by David and Kylie Platt (Paula Lane), signed over by Audrey when she wished to show faith in David and his future (Audrey supported David’s marriage to Kylie, where many did not). If this is correct, then the first obvious point is that Audrey could have protected herself by granting David and Kylie a lease, rather than sell or transfer the freehold. The lease could have contained a number of restrictions concerning the business, such as the name of the property – that would have at least prevented Audrey having to tear down the “under new management” sign, for which she has been arrested for criminal damage. However, the main issue is, of course, the hairdressing business.
11. Mechanical
“Good. Because I want us to be friends.”
problems? And if so, minor problems or major ones that affect your
Making a game on Android is easy. Making a great game for a mobile, multitasking, often multi-core, multi-purpose system like Android is trickier. Even the best developers frequently make mistakes in the way they interact with the Android system and with other applications — mistakes that don’t affect the quality of gameplay, but which affect the quality of the user’s experience in other ways.
Sapphique leaves you guessing about the specifics, freeing you to imagine the possibilities of who ends up with who and how the world changes after the story ends.
This is bad.
What is seditious in this country, is indeed what the establishment deems it to be. If an elected rep like Nurul Izzah cannot speak up, then what about you and me? And how come Brahim’s ugly rhetoric isn’t deemed seditious?
- 44 x 37 x 3.5 cm
anyway, i had meeting today, seems we're going to be working on an oral history project here in town. fortunately, i'm just in an advisory position because as interesting as the project will be, it is far more work than most people think, i think for 20 minutes of usable footage could mean 30 hours of raw footage that is not only shot, but then has to be reviewed and edited... but , sitting at the table was a lesson in savannah history...hearing about the backstory on the who, what , where and how of our city market came to be...and how it has evolved over the years...recollections of events and the stories handed down by parents and grandparents. some of the members of the committee can trace family history back to almost the founding of savannah. the stories are incredible..as are the people. these will be fascinating meetings!
But consider: After subtracting for inflation, prices are also back to 1986 levels. And 1955 levels. And 1895 levels (see chart).
the weight deadens
“Ah, maaan . . .”
Strangely, no one at the Bloomberg campaign asked for an accounting until The Post began raising questions in late January about who was behind Special Election Operations, the name of which had surfaced in public filings.
“I’m glad you like it” Charles breathed a sigh of relief.
organic and these guys are so good they are a big part
A couple of Mckenzee funnies:
those so I had fun and got paid. Unfortunately,
6. Star Spangled Banner / closing remarks
Yup, it’s happening. I’m changing the theme for Tuesday. I really feel the new one will be better for me and for you. The new theme is…
For those seeking a brief introduction to the history of Trinitarian thinking within the church and an engagement with 20th Century contributions Steve's book is a good starting place. The footnotes and bibliography will guide you to many other valuable resources. And Steve's writing about the Cappadocian Fathers will have you rushing out to buy English versions or learning Greek to read them for yourself.
I asked them to come into another room with me, took a deep cleansing breath and calmly told them that I wanted to be near them, but that I needed to just be quiet and read by myself for a while. I told them that I was available to help them get food or overcome a problem with the TV or computer, but that otherwise I needed to recharge my batteries. Then I apologized.
I wanted to post a quick card I made for my oldest granddaughter, Hailey. She is getting baptized on Sunday and we are all so proud of her and love her so very much for the life decision she has made.
Just put Erik on the train back to the city.
Melanie hadn’t a clue what he was talking about until she got home and inserted the card into her computer. She stared aghast at the photo, one Alexander had taken when they first moved to Rubicon Ranch. Apparently it remained on the card when the rest of the images had been erased. She dropped her head in her hands. Of all the people in the world, Seth was the last one she’d want to see that photo of herself in gauzy desert clothes, silhouetted against a sunny window, leaving nothing to the imagination.
The City of Rome and the Vatican City – A Treasure Chest.
your white bra snug against your breasts,
I wasn't sure how to respond to that. I have felt the same feeling at Jill's grave - the feeling that she's there - I wrote about it here and here. I feel her presence there, and I feel like she's listening to me when I talk to her, so I know exactly what Katie means by that. To me, it's that "connection" thing that I wrote about before. That connection I had with Jill was never broken, even in death. Katie has that too. With Jill. But she doesn't have it with her dad, because she never really had a chance to know him. And that's why she doesn't feel anything at his grave.
4. Bobby Conn "King for a Day" 3:53
Sift about half the flour mixture over the eggs and with a balloon whisk or spatula gently but rapidly fold in the flour. Repeat until all the flour has been folded in. Be very careful to not overmix at this point. You do not want to deflate the eggs mixture. Now gently fold in the butter mixture just until incorporated. When you are folding make sure you reach all the way to the bottom of the bowl to ensure you have mixed all the flour in. Make sure all the traces of flour have been mixed in... but again, do not over do it! When you stop seeing flour, stop folding! Gently pour the cake batter into the prepared pan. Do not move the batter about in the pan. It will fall out and it should fill the pan about 3/4 of an inch to the top if you haven't deflated the eggs.
Library: 13
What does it all mean? I’ve come to the conclusion that after months of high energy output and a strict daily discipline to composing each chapter, I was slowly losing my edge and enthusiasm for want of a little writing variety; a holiday, if you will, from work on the novel to relax my brain and get the juices flowing again.
Not that there’s anything wrong with that.
Or the week before that - that all of my favorite ink pens went missing including those I buy with my own money because they are too expensive for the school to buy.
And, put simply, that was not bad at all.
Mad Men artfully dramatizes the many ways female identity can wiggle and re-shape in even the narrowest spaces, from captivating leading ladies to intriguing supporting characters. The show has explored some popularly held notions of femininity, some of which were already ossified by the 1960s, by placing these notions within the context of an advertising campaign. When Paul Kinsey proposed his "new concept" for the Playtex account in Maidenform, (S2, E6), "All women want to be Jackie Kennedy or Marilyn Monroe", he wasn't referring to their conservative or liberal politics. He was putting a mid-century spin on the old Freudian concept of "the chaste versus the loose" woman. The return of the show for season five is a great opportunity to look back, and in the words of advertising man Leo Burnett, see “the inherent drama of everyday life” through the eyes of Peggy, Joan and Betty, Mad Men's powerful feminine mystique.
Both appeared in The Dumfries and District Music Festival (Speech section) yesterday. The Poetry was a little emotional, as it was a big class and T1 and T2 took 1st and 2nd.
they investigated steroids
But the whole three Persons are co-eternal together and co-equal.
Given that most people in Britain, and indeed many average Americans do not follow the US news very closely, they probably do not realise how frequently this revisionist race reversal happens. However examples abound, a December 2007 episode of CSI (Vegas), which aired in Britain a few weeks ago, was called “Lying down with Dogs” and featured a rich and glamorous white woman, who, although publicly a humanitarian philanthropist, was secretly involved in the sadistic sport of Dog fighting. This evil white woman died a nasty death, when one of her very white (and rather cute' as I recall) kennel boys set set some of her dogs on her.
Thank god then for Shahid Kapoor who is the saving grace of the film – throwing everything and the kitchen sink at the role, he really does bring the character of Harry to life as well as showing enormous range as an actor. From a young boy in love to the heartbroken air force officer as well as in that wonderful scene in the fairground at the end, Shahid is on top form and really makes the most of this role. But unfortunately, this comes at a price; rather than allowing Shahid to shine alongside the merits of the film, Shahid unknowingly becomes the main attraction and the script quite simply is unable to cater for providing him with a worthy showcase. But that he still impresses speaks volumes of his star power and hopefully, Shahid’s next few projects will utilise him correctly like Jab We Met and Kaminey did, so that his appeal goes beyond his fan base.
'Nothing of him that doth fade / But doth suffer a sea-change / Into something rich and strange'.
“In the case of various religions, the faithful are supposedly rewarded in the afterlife for sparring with the “devil.” In the case of the “patriot,” the so-called “New World Order” is viewed as the demonic bogeyman, with the reward for opposing it supposedly being an increased amount of “personal freedom.”
Beautiful Life
On November 17th, I will be the guest speaker for the Amarillo Rotary Clubs luncheon located at Amarillo Country Club and I'm putting together details for a possible trip to several Colorado bookstores as well as a spring feed store tour through Texas and Oklahoma.
There you have it, my cute little baby card inspired by a room! I just love that cute vintage image, and have been wanting to find some inspiration to use it! Now I finally have...and I love that! I have had it in my stash forever!
I'll update you next week....
So, um... I'm not sure what my actual point was when I started this post, other than what you already know: tension is good for stories!
I find it odd that Cassandra isn't credited on this album. It could be that she simply joined the group when they went on tour, or maybe she was using a fake name. The girl on the left in this photo from the back of the album sure looks like Cassandra to me.
“I have to write you up for fighting, you know,” Pam said. “That is a whole ‘nother charge. Could keep you here another six months, maybe longer.”
christmas day was on sunday this year. we had church at 9:00 so we got up a little early so we could open presents before church.
But I don't care
A script I “finished” more than three years ago, I once again am putting back together after one of my long time collaborators and I ripped it apart. And I have to admit that I am super thankful for the advent of computers, because if I had to start with literally a blank page each rewrite, my fingers would be worn to the nubs on this particular script alone. Though I’m still not letting the cat out of the bag with the subject or title, let me just say, the evolution of the story has been interesting… From a fluffy funny concept, to really digging in, and truly going for something that possibly could be something “great.”
Today I received this comment on an earlier post. -I copied and pasted the post exactly for all my readers to enjoy:
LÄPPLE: There was a second section in Ratzinger’s thesis devoted to Bonaventure’s theology of history, comparing it to that of Gioacchino da Fiore, and Schmaus had not expressed any critical judgement on that section. The section had its own autonomy and could even be read as a finished text in itself. So Söhngen also suggested to Ratzinger: cut the first part, which is what is causing problems, and re-present the second on
Rest in the fridge for 10 minutes while you bring your oven to 170 Celsius (340 Farenheit).
The waist is faced with ribbon, and there's a back zipper and slit.
Pebble soup has teamed up with TOTAL Greek Yoghurt to give one reader the chance of winning a healthy start up pack.
All these photos of the churchyard were taken by me on Wednesday in Poulton le fylde, On a rainy spring day. Usually the flowering is much more profuse, it is a little sparce this year. People travel here every year to take photos, it is such a gorgeous display (photos not doing justice) and they buy postcards which are for sale in St. Chads church (where my Mum's funeral was, and where I was married to my first husband in 1978!)
Is there a post office box where we can send you cards? That is such a simple but uplifting thing - nice for you to receive and feel the love and support and we (the readers) feel like we can do something positive for you.
It’s clear enough that any alternative publishing model will likely be internet-based, with interactive components possibly similar to Math Overflow or blog comment sections. It has also been noted that women have significantly less visible presence on MO than they do in research mathematics overall. One might ask, therefore, whether switching to an internet forum-based model of publishing could have the side effect of alienating women mathematicians and driving them out of the field.
Train, train and train again until you are fully competent with your choice of weapons. Personal incompetance with your firearms is inexcusable and can cost you your life. You need to be able to transition smoothly between any weapons you own and might end up using to engage an enemy threat.
We always do Fun Friday (which is sometimes a field trip), though I do not always manage to blog about it (my camera is on the fritz and I have had computer trouble, so my participation has been sketchy recently). To facilitate this, we accomplish our "regular" work in four days, leaving Friday free for doing the more creative and exploratory activities...or just resting, playing, being crafty, gardening, etc.
Writing is my talent. Writing, certainly not design; my stylist would be disappointed if he saw me standing at the stove in my jeans and hoodie. The one thing that might garner his approval is my hair. I have stayed true to myself in this area. I have not cut my wavy brown locks, which are at this moment tamed in a braid that trails down my back. Tied to the schedule of the President’s demanding lifestyle, it is the easiest thing.
In my day, most chorus teachers accompanied their students on piano, both in class and in performance, and this record captures the simple style of those performances.
Card # 755: Joel Hanrahan, 2011 Topps Update Gold US105, Pittsburgh Pirates (755/2011)
1. The only way out is through.
The most memorable store was Eva B, where its a sensory overload full of clothes, mannequins and bras hanging from the ceiling, and a $1 bin of clothing where you literally just have to dig around. It's a mountainous heap of clothing, and if you're ready to get your hands dirty, it's quite a thrill to find something for one dollar. Though at times it feels like searching for a needle in the haystack.
After this time, add the peel, zest and chocolate chips and amalgamate.
The Second Saturday Art Walk is always special. Though it is advertised to start late in the day, things really begin happening around lunch time and since Natural Stone Jewelry by Susen Foster will be some of the featured artwork at Simply Oklahoma – THE coolest art gallery in my experience – you can bet that I will be there by noon to hang out with my old and new friends until I wear out.
Now, rather than racking up nearly 15 hours of flight pay, we're possibly losing this trip and stuck here.
Fuel your bones with other key nutrients.
and disappeared into the grayish twilight.
Trust me, my back stitch is not fabulous. Not. Even. Close.
I tried to cry it out. I tried to sleep it away. I tried to drink it away. Nothing worked. Finally I realized I had to take another risk and pick myself up. The mere one sentence transition doesn’t do enough justice to the difficulty of taking this risk. How far would you go to fix your broken life and ultimately, your broken soul? I had to find out.
8. Just a Little Girl
So whether the fault lies with me or the nurseries, I have come up with a plan that I hope will turn me into a successful plant owner/ green-thumb.
At the same time, I followed the restoration of the Bethesda Terrace and it took years, millions of dollars, and resulted in a truly beautiful FREE space for ALL in the city to share. So I do think in the case of this group (they were apprehended in the act) that they should get a jail sentence that will take effect if they don't work on the restoration crew that has to undo what they did.
In the dance.
“Shhh! He just sat down at the table behind you!”
It’s not that she was particularly evil, it’s that teenagers really do stink sometimes.
Andy
Drinks: Mead
I am really please with this hand made flower. It is a sizzix die of different shaped petals. I cut the petals from Bazzil card and then spritzed with Cosmic shimmers, scrunched the shapes up in a ball and then unfurled them and shaped using a ball tool and an embossing mat.
summer rain -
If one holds these high principles clearly before one’s eyes, and compares them with the life and spirit of our times, then it appears glaringly that civilized mankind finds itself at present in grave danger, In the totalitarian states it is the rulers themselves who strive actually to destroy that spirit of humanity. In less threatened parts it is nationalism and intolerance, as well as the oppression of the individuals by economical means, which threaten to choke these most precious traditions.
So what is Thunderbird Energetica? It's a small "artisan energy bar company committed to producing powerful sources of human fuel." Every bar is handmade, they use "real" ingredients, and even the wrappers are biodegradable. Cool. I'm on board with that. They also are super into supporting athletes--runners, bikers, triathalon-ers, etc. Also fine. So, if that's where the story stopped, I'd be happy to hop on by my local natural foods store and buy a few bars.
Charles is one of those characters who you immediately like and respect, although later you start to wonder if you have him right. We meet Gladiator, Sarah, Nigel, Sonia and others and in each one we find something to not like about them and you start to feel that these are real people. However the story twists and turns and we start to learn that Charles wasn't asked back to find Gladiator at all - there is another agenda that makes the plot that much more cerebral and brings about comparisons to John Le Carré's works.
Anyway, one of my favorite parts of the ministry was a student leadership team we had for seniors only called the Timothy Tag Team (TTT). It was solely by invitation and was offered to the seniors who had stepped it up and owned their faith and our ministry the most over the previous years. It culminated in their final summer with a local missions/bonding trip. Due to my transition to San Diego, the last group of seniors had to finish out the final 5 months of their senior year without me by their side when I left in February, 2005. A few days ago, one of them- Shawn Cummins- posted on facebook a letter I wrote to the team as they headed into their final TTT trip. Oh dang did it bring back memories. I copied it all below or you can read it on his facebook notes here. The baton he mentions was something I gave every student on my last Wed. Night in Powerhouse.
Joe has a great setup and can show multiple games at once. He has a huge HD screen behind the bar, a giant projection on the wall and a PC to show online games at espn3.com/BigTenNetwork/etc. He also is a collector of "mini" helmets and has the full NFL set as well as 99% of FBS college football schools. Each week he sets up the helmets based on the weekly match-ups! If you look close you can see the 2011-12 bowl match-ups.
“So you don’t need the junk anymore,” she smiled, deliberately changing the subject.
-1 piece of fabric 18 inches X16 inches
display of honesty, an abrupt show of hands.
Once roux has reached desired shade, carefully stir in the rendered smoked sausage stirring for 1 minute. Stir in 1 teaspoon of the Cajun seasoning, a little over half of the holy trinity and the garlic. Stir about 10 minutes or until vegetables are soft. Move roux mixture to a large stockpot and return to medium high heat.
Levi Johnston plans on naming his new baby, Breeze Beretta…after a gun. It’s time he retire his johnston. Privileges revoked!!
There was an immense amount of goings on from last week through the weekend. At some point all will be revealed but for now enjoy this clip from one of last weekend's highlights, the 3rd Annual Fort Greene Fest. Mos Def Headlined a concerted that featured Res, Game Rebellion and hyper local talents Mr. Mecc, and Tai Allen, to name a few. There was also a ridiculously tone-deaf set by a certain local rapper who couldnt take a hint.
You see, it was only the previous day that I came to know that I was required to “walk to Gaumukh.” We were to reach the glacier that evening and head back the next day. But, I had come packed for a 45°C Delhi summer. Six layers of clothing, a stick and a small purse carrying boiled sweets was all the gear available for what is otherwise, “a three day trek of 38km (return)” according to Lonely Planet.
But looking at this picture…it looks truly awesome w/ the way the light and the color play. I like to take pictures randomly through the wood, playing w/ the different speeds. This was one of those whims.
So, since I was cooped up inside for the past seven days,
to see if I felt
Go ahead and get married, have the last name of an ex-hubby, change your name legally. The Black curse is upon you all Buahahahaha. –stops for water and takes Xanax-.
Here is the mundane babbling part. July has been a month of artistic constipation--not so much that creative juices aren't flowing, I just don't have time to stop and let them out. Not healthy at all. I think I'm getting septic. We had a family reunion for a week, see below:
Who is your favourite character from THE EMERALD CITY and why? Gail. She’s tough and snarky, but she cares about others.
Some of the fun I've been having has been redoing a couple of beds. This bed I rarely have shown pictures of because it's sort of been a bit of a mess. I kept trying to grow full sun plants here, but they just leaned and looked floppy. So I took almost everything out and started over. One little spot gets lots of sun, so I planted a Chocolate Eupatorium there. I also added Heucheras, Astrania and a hardy fuchsia. I left the Hydrangea 'Pinky Winky' which was new last year, Clematis 'Jackmanni' (which loves it here) and Daphne 'Summer Ice'. My goal is to keep this bed a bit more orderly than the rest of the yard since I need to get in to water the window boxes and put a ladder in here when we clean the gutters (something that we need to do frequently since there are several large trees that drop leaves, needles and cones year round).
Hermione at the Yule Ball
“Madhu-pati,” the Sweet Protector, has a romantic connotation since madhu implies “honey” and pati is the word for husband.
One last thing about Bangalore: the weather. It’s often described as “San Diego-like.” While my two day sample hardly constitutes proof, I would have to agree. Ron Burgundy would feel right at home. It was pleaseant, so pleasant in fact, that I felt every one of the 31 degrees of heat when I landed in Chennai this morning.
As luck would have it, I stayed with a steady 10:00 pace the entire time. I kept my dental hygienist’s ponytail in my vision as she trotted about 100 yards ahead of me, and after just giving birth four months ago, if SHE COULD RUN SO COULD I, dang it. My RunKeeper kept me up on my time, distance and pace the entire way, so if you are looking for a good free running app, I highly recommend! Anyway, as I finished up the race in almost exactly 30 minutes, I could see Nathan in the medical tent grinning ear to ear and I honestly was so proud of myself. For the first time in a long time, I feel more “in-shape,” less “you-look-so-good-for-having-twins”.
It very nearly derails both our hands
“Hey Harold, what’d the leper say to the prostitute? Keep the tip – so sorry, Harold, ran out of tips. Besides, you can pick your own off the drugstore shelf for about $5.”
Best buys/ discoveries: Ruby Nail Polish, Pearl silk dress/coat thing at an amazing price, Green bag from ASOS.
of which are still being restituted to their original owners today.
lips: MAC pencil in Vino
On our third day in DC/VA we decided to the bike, available at our rental house, for a whirl around Old Town Alexandria. This was a great way to see the town and hook up with the Mt. Vernon trail on the Potomac.
of baby clothes were part of the provisioning for the ship, for (as The Times
Here's a really great tip that I got about slicing your cake layers: use dental floss! Crazy, eh? I mentioned in my first cake post that I got one of those levelers, which didn't work very well. A reader told me that I should just use floss- which turned out to be really effective! Give it a whirl next time you bake a cake. =)
No, nothing surprises me. When the political elite has no solutions for specific problems, they invent fictive ones to cover up their inefficacy. Some speak about the issue of the flags, others about the alleged linguistic conflict in Catalonia. This is just smoke.
The weather these days reminds me of my childhood. I remember trudging home on hot autumn afternoons, crunching dried gold and russet leaves underfoot, kicking horse chestnuts ahead of my little feet, and relishing in the smell of burning leaves in someone’s garden.
Then suddenly, several weeks later, she called and told me that a place had opened back up due to illness and would I be interested? Boy howdy! So, in the end, I did do my week long workshop in Paris and spent what was possibly one of the best weeks since I've moved here.
Here’s a brief photo album from the trip:
Oldsmobile's 1969 Cutlass.
I'm ready to give my life or spend time in jail protecting my wife or daughter... I'm not sure I'm ready give my life or spend time in jail protecting your wife or children at the expense of my family's well-being... although my basic instinct and natural inclination is to step in and help.
The doorbell rings. Flowers from my Tom arrive.
The report also found that in the 2009-10 school year, 74 percent of Title III districts reported having 100 percent of their teachers serving English-learners “fully certified” to do so. But nearly the same percentage of districts said that the “lack of expertise among mainstream teachers to address the needs” of English-learners was a “moderate or major challenge.”
Last night we ate indoors because of the rain. It was pasta (vegetarian as well as a sauce with meatballs), a shredded carrot salad and a marvelous, rich quiche. We were quieter than usual. I think everyone is working so hard and doing their best to make the hours count.
The vast majority of us will have friends and followers who find us after they’ve read our books and decide to seek us out online. We want to be sure and have a solid presence ready for them when they do. Another, smaller percentage of us will manage to build a significant online presence that will then lead our friends and followers to our work. You have to decide for your own self and your own path where you will put your energy. Where you WANT to put your energy. For every person who found a book deal through their blog, there are many more who sold the book first and developed on online presence to interact with the readers that book brought looking for them.
The expression, ‘Every Picture has a story to tell’ – is a very popular among photography enthusiasts. Capturing engaging, clear and inspirational images is a challenging task which cannot be achieved without high quality camera and lenses. Earlier, photographers had to fit bulky cameras and had to wait for long time to click the perfect photograph.
They are their own little personalities...that's for sure.
SO it was with great interest that we read critic Dwight Garner's wry and interesting essay in last week's NYT Sunday Review about modern reading habits in the era of the electric book. Mr. Garner considers the future of the paperbook and causes this reader to wax nostalgic about the charms of the book: "You can’t read an e-book in the tub. You can’t fling one across the room, aiming, as Mark Twain liked to do, at a cat. And e-books will not furnish a room." He also mentions "The one bit of verse that charmed me, when read on the iPad, was Clive James’s brilliant and witty “The Book of My Enemy Has Been Remaindered.” This poem forces you to wonder: What will remainders look like in our digital future? Where’s the 99-cents bin going to be? " More here
It got me thinking, I have crayons and markers in all of my kiddos spaces, organized in adorable matching decor.
- Do we really need this?
“How in the hell can that be?”
2. Once it is published, click on the title of the post. This will lead you to the static link for your post. The static link is the page with only that post on it. Copy the url from your browser at the top of the page.
How many gestures ,
I can only hope that my remaining offspring prefers indoor vacationing.
Third game and matchups made me play against the same opponent as the first game. I’m still to play against any Cryx in tourneys! This time we were both as cautios as the first game but it was nicer to actually know what the beasties did this time. In the end we were running out of time and I feated to utterly destroy his Raek (on single Doom Reaver blow without feat on him) and his Typhon.
#7. coming home from work to a hubby cooking dinner
Sue Duffy is an award-winning writer whose work has appeared in Moody magazine, The Presbyterian Journal, Sunday Digest, and The Christian Reader. She is the author of Mortal Wounds (Barbour, 2001), Fatal Loyalty (Kregel, 2010), and The Sound of Red Returning (Kregel, 2011). Sue has also contributed to Stories for a Woman’s Heart (Multnomah). She and her husband, Mike, have three grown children.
I noticed that at the end of the evening the hug was tighter and longer. I also noticed from then on that when I saw him shake hands, he always did it with real feeling.
From the outset these bulk zoning controls had their advocates and fierce critics, and fantasies and analogies to past middle-eastern civilizations was a common theme. There was a fascination with Babylon and the tower of Babel, and setback skyscrapers were often to as modern ziggurats in the “New Babylon of New York.”[2] The writings of Harvey Wiley Corbett, accompanied the illustrations of Hugh Ferris, were influential.
The PS90 easily disassembles with the push of a single button into two parts that fit in the bag; because there is no gas system it is also very easy to clean. The two extra rifle magazine pouches are accessible while wearing the pack. The lower exterior pocket contains the FAK. The rain cover keeps things dry and looking
would never ward off the nefarious juju Zapiro's cartoon has become
The move turns up the competitive heat on web startups such as Dropbox, Box and Evernote, as well as with Microsoft Corp and its SkyDrive service.
Filling a gallery wall can be expensive, but framing a great print, postcard, calendar, fabric, photo etc. is my favorite way to add interest to walls without breaking the bank. (Like I did here and here.) For a gallery wall, I like to use varying sizes of items, so I looked for large prints first.
This flower is made from tissue paper! It's a great project to do with a mat that is on it's last legs, because you want one that is as un-sticky as possible (so that you'll be able to get the tissue paper off again). Cut yourself a 12x12ish square of tissue paper and adhere it to your mat. Then cut as many scalloped circles as you can fit on the page (either using the "auto-fill" feature on your Expression or setting it up that way on your Gypsy).
On a personal note, when my own three daughters were young, my wife and I sometimes took turns putting some of them down – other times my wife put all of them down – they were a few years apart in age and they had different ”down” times – so we either flipped a coin or whoever was wanting to step up put them down. It never needed to be overanalyzed – sometimes one of the girls would choose one of us to put her down.
FB: Non! You know, like maybe if you want to cover up something or something...
Elton John is a Grammy Award winning English Singer, Songwriter, Composer, and Pianist.
A spokesman for the BBC said they had received 23 complaints about the programme, which was broadcast on Wednesday evening. And how many watched? According to the Graun, who I imagine would like nothing better than the anger of the terminally thin skinned over Clarkson's shoot public sector strikers remark to kill TG's viewing figures, five million people watched and it was the most popular show in its time slot. Assuming every one of those 23 who complained actually watched the show that's 0.00046% of viewers who were offended, and given that about a million people in the UK are of Indian ethnicity it says even more that only 23 complained. Not that all those 23 were necessarily Indian - some are probably white, middle class Graun readers getting offended on behalf of Indians, who presumably don't know when they're being offended. Certainly some of the people taking to message boards and Twatter seem to be.
Happy March Everyone! - spring can't be far behind.
The Russian wizard paused a moment to…straighten his broken body into something somewhat more upright. There was a couple visceral pops and a squelching noise.
Aries is quick to lash out, but is also quick to laugh. In balance, Aries can be great fun to be around–there’s always something new to explore, and boredom is not tolerated. Aries is also one hell of a lover. I mean, come on, Rams. Horns. Ruled by the head. Get it?
“We could bring those responsibilities with us, I suppose,” said Diane.
PS: ABC News also refers to these creatures as 'jihadis'. *Gasp* Are elements of the dinosaur media finally starting to catch up to Joshuapundit??!!? What's next? Using the "T" word?
After another stop at Katsura Grill for Sandra to sample an Okonomi Yaki for herself, I had to make a stop at the Garden House to try another of their sake cocktails.
I will BHLDN my breathe until I see more!
Wraiths
As Stashoholic Confessionals go, this is not a super big one. But it’s been preying on my mind since I bought the fabric a couple of weeks ago—so bear with me. And the patterns. They were not bought at the same time, but I might as well get it all of my chest in one post, right?
Newspapers. Since the beginning of time, the Sunday paper has come equipped with bazillions of coupon-stuffed circulars. If you can’t swing a subscription, bum them off friends and family after they’re done reading. This is how I amass most of my deals. (Thanks, Dad.)
You should play as your character realizes the danger they put themselves and the party in and changes themselves. You could even have, after the altercation with the other party members the character goes to the other extreme.
Practical Polymer Clay Tips
A presentation of a seemingly inscrutable mystery or complex entropic puzzle in which the protagonists have an intrinsic physical involvement and as a result undergo tangible, horrific and excruciating transformations, dramatic destruction or decay. The protracted resolution becomes a frantic search for revelation, a greater degree of comprehension or simply a fleeting intimation of fundamental cause. You could think of it as The Postman Always Rings Twice meets David Cronenberg meets the second law of thermodynamics.
I don’t know quite what’s happened to my blog writing skills. There was a time when I could turn even the most insignificant event into something worth reading, but these days I’m finding it harder and harder to do.
My father, Martin Klein, carries two things in his pants pocket often more useful than his wallet: a jackknife and a handkerchief. Growing up, my siblings and I witnessed the single blade jackknife do the obvious — cut gum out of hair, slice string and tape around packages, shave bark from twigs for toasting marshmallows, unravel knots in yoyo strings and shoe laces, pare oranges, peel carrots, tighten screws on toys and my mother’s pots, fix parts of lawnmowers, and repair farm machinery and car engines. Likewise, his handkerchief, freshly ironed and white, was equally useful. There’d always be a clean spot for blowing noses, wiping faces and hands, drying tears, checking the oil, cleaning up spills, wrapping a cut, and polishing an apple.
But our interactions were seldom. I did not seek him out, and he wasn’t in my class anyway – apart from one or two subjects in the senior cycle. He was sickly and missed an awful lot of school. I’m sure he was subject to a lot more intensive bullying and brutality, particularly on the way home from school, but we had different routes home so I didn’t witness anything. To be honest, he just didn’t figure on my radar screen most of the time. I had other, more interesting, more important interests and concerns.
I guess Mom knew the “10-second Fear Rule” because she was quickly down to business.
So... are we all getting out lovely Christmas cakes made? I think technically they should have been done a week or so ago now (to give them time to mature before Christmas) but you all still have time should you want to!
- 1937: Japan invasion China
Thanks Kelli for the update. I had no clue she was back, nor was I looking for her.
* My take on “Friendship Coaches” for kids. Because, you know, they get friendship all wrong without professional help.http://bit.ly/avsWyx
The game felt wonderful at that time. Everything, really everything, was awesome. I think the true World of Warcraft was the old pre-60 content. That’s where all the fun was. Dungeons were not a mere zerg through the mobs to get loot, loot didn’t even mean much to me in those dungeons, what I wanted was to kill harder stuff. Looking back I giggle every time I remember the corpse runs back to Wailing Caverns. There was a lot of stuff, important and helpful stuff, that we didn’t have at those times and had to be compensated, most times not perfectly, with Add-Ons. In a way, WoW today is better for having some recent tools and whatnot. On the other hand, I feel it has lost other times’ epicness. Some say the game got worst, some say it has moved on on it’s natural course of life.
Here are some other fun inhabitants of the island:
It's not really my cup of tea but I thought I'd put up here in case you wanted to participate.
No. We're not talking about wrapping paper with printed with cogs, although it may come to that. We're not even talking about using the blueprints for a particularly luxurious Time Machine, because I'm keeping those under wraps (A pun! Geddit?) until my experimentation is complete.
"It gets dark."
3 eggs
In celebration of the build-up to National Flash Fiction Day 2012 I am encouraging submissions of extreme flash-fictions. Flash-fiction has many definitions and can range from short stories under 1000 words to under 50 words.
Marimacha / Mary-Macho / masculine lesbian
With my lack of energy, I am channeling all this grief energy into a project for another grieving mama. God, that gift helps so immensely. I meditated tonglen yesterday. Sometimes, it is easier to do tonglen when you are suffering, in my experience, because I can start from that place of saying, "Because I feel this way, I know others feel this way. May I feel it so others do not have to feel it." Sometimes the suffering is so self-absorbing, that you cannot get out of your own suffering. Then the meditation should be for yourself. I am not there, thankfully. Gratefully.
*stupid *%@#&!!*
Don’t get me wrong, I think that it is great that these authors are taking on the challenge of envisioning a sci-fi/fantasy landscape that is more representative of diversity of both world histories and of the contemporary landscapes that we live in (particularly if it is carefully and mindfully done). With a name like Riordan’s on the cover, not only will the book appeal to young people of color, who have been looking for characters that look like them in the literature that they love, but the book will also appeal to and reach Riordan’s typical audiences, who love his stories regardless of the face on the cover. All of this is a good thing.
April 20
From the thundering rhythm section of the opening track and first single/video "Find Forever Gone" to the epic, soaring chorus of "Fades Like a Song" to the chugging guitarwork in "Burn the Sky" to the beautiful piano elegy of the closing track "Nine Hours", Beautiful Death continues Bella Morte's much adored and revered legacy, of which bands like AFI and My Chemical Romance has popularized as of late. Beautiful Death retains the band's signature sound while expanding its breadth.
Nothing is permanent except change.
*You still are not a fan of meat
of course i don't wish to imply that making a card for lovely husband jeff's lovely dad could EVER be anything less than a joy! my father-in-law just happens to be one of my favorite people: he is fun, he is funny, he is kind, smart and thoughtful, he is creative and talented, interesting and interested... in short, he's everything you'd like a man to be... and he taught his children, by example, to be just like him; which is a big part of the reason my husband is the amazing man he is. yepper, in the marriage lottery, i was lucky enough to choose a winning ticket 26.5 years ago, for which i could not be more grateful!
For those of you that would like to make this yourself, which I KNOW you totally can, here is an abridged version on how to make this. If you need any help or have questions, you can email me also.
I started an art journal several months ago. It's a fun little book where I get to play with my supplies and document things that might not make it onto a scrapbook page. To streamline the process, I like to use either scraps from recent pages or leftover kit contents. The colors are already matched which is a great time saver. Playing with scraps, I'm also not as worried about using up something valuable that I might want or need later. Double bonus!
AND THEN RILEY PROPOSED AND THEY GOT MARRIED AND LIVED HAPPILY EVER AFTER WITH LOTS OF BOOKS AND THEN THEY TOPPLED A DYSTOPIAN SOCIETY TOGETHER AND IT WAS BEAUTIFUL
Being such a clean, renewable and cheap (essentially free) for of energy it was a no brainer that I chose solar as my alternative energy source. The only problem with solar is the exorbitant cost to get regular commercial system installed, the quote for my home was $9500!, I found this ridiculous, I calculated it would take me over a decade to recoup the money, so digging a little deeper I discovered an extremely affordable do it yourself solution.
This past Sunday, we had the privilege to have Pastor Mike McCune and his wife, Sarah, and 8-month old vibrant baby Nathan, visit Titus Bible Church from Challenge in northern California. Pastor Mike gave a sermon that we can all say was not only informative but very encouraging and a great reminder to ponder over and meditate on not only the death, but also the resurrection of Christ our Lord.
Plaintiffs further assert that the adverse and detrimental consequences of continued and deforestation are so capable of unquestionable demonstration that the same may be submitted as a matter of judicial notice. This notwithstanding, they expressed their intention to present expert witnesses as well as documentary, photographic and film evidence in the course of the trial.
But I want to take it a step further, to show people the significant difference food from the backyard garden can make in a recipe, and to learn how to be a leader in the movement toward sustainable development in the community. I want to document all of the wonderful contributions being made by the unsung heroes of the movement, and I want to be part of it, either as a volunteer, a post-graduate intern, or having a decision-making position in the cause.
Unorthodox is an understatement. New students don’t enter the Academy. New people don’t enter the sector. Everyone who lives here is born here, so where did this guy come from?
Enjoy your long weekend!
Miss C: Okay. Wait. I don't want to be made of animal skin. Can I be not a person but just have skin like a person?
Her colleague Jaykumari Dila, a 29-year old ASHA from the same district, took the job because the family was under heavy debt.
Thanks Cynthia!
I learned about Fabuloso from my great friend, Malaine (who, sadly lives in Missouri and way too far away). I walked in her kitchen one day when she had just mopped and it smelled fabuloso! I love to use it now. They make other scents but I prefer the purple. There is a spray version for countertops but I prefer my next favorite product for that.
Happy Birthday Mom! Wishing you nothing but good health and a continued sense of humor! I love you.
This is about supporting the small, local farmer, and knowing what is in our food and where it came from. It's about eating less processed junk that doesn't do us any good. It's about teaching our kids (no, I'm not pregnant, I'm speaking about our collective kids, I'm on a bit of a soapbox here, go with me) what real food is and how it should taste. It's about sustainability and treating animals, even if you plan to eat them, humanely. It's about supporting businesses that treat their employees well. It's about keeping our planet from turning into one big trashcan. It's about our health.
“One of my goals is to keep Romney from being in a position to rush the nomination. The longer this goes on the more clearer it is how unconservative his record is.”
Ohhh it's Wednesday night again. Well that means I (Michele F.) am here to share with you the WINNERS for our last photo challenge. You are all winners in my book!! But that would be too easy. So here is your Winner and 2 Honorable mentions. Again... thanks so much for sticking it out with us from week to week!
Organizers of the Integrated Science and Asian Culture Academy (known as ISAAC) said the school would have 900 students when they applied for a $225,000 grant in 2008, records show. Today, the school has just 26 students, records show. The school occupies space at the Somerset Academy in South Miami.
For almost a couple of weeks with almost reckless computerized abandonment of human decency and compassion for his fellow man, President Obama has rallied a global lynch mob atmosphere in the cold-blooded mafia styled liquidation and extra judicial slaughter of an innocent man of faith and color. It wasn’t Osama Bin Laden. Bin Laden has been dead for almost 10 years.
Now, comes the best part! You can actually use all three tags with each other! Say you want something bold and italicized, then use the tags.
Zaina is a twelve-year-old werewolf isolated on an island and only knows about werewolves. During this novel, she discovers other lifeforms exist, like carnivorous butterflies and witches. She suspects that humans may still exist as well. She meets a host of new friends who help her on the path of for filling the prophecy predicting she will save the world.
Forever lost in forsaken missives and satan’s pull
- Spring Fling Pesto Competition, a benefit for Chefs for the Marcellus, protecting food from fracking. This Sunday in Gowanus. Eventbrite
At first we were just going to come for five days but decided in the end to double that. I'm glad we did because Paul's been having a whale of time. A few days ago we all went to the swimming pool, which is something Paul's missed a lot because I don’t know a man who’s willing to come with us. I can’t take him alone, because obviously he’s not allowed in the ladies changing room and I’m not allowed in the men’s and Paul can’t really manage on his own (neither can he be entirely trusted not to touch things he shouldn't when he isn't being supervised). Needless to say, he loved every second of it! He played with his baby niece in the tiny tots pool, swam with his sister in the bigger children’s pool, had lots of fun on the big slides and thought the wave pool was hilarious.
Please – please! – share your reactions, chortles, favorite lines, memories of that night, and general criticism according to your prefered school of literary theory.
I also managed another three sets of 2 pull ups. Sucks balls, yo. But, it sucks SLIGHTLY less each time, which is a good sign.
Rel pushed in between Pollack and Van Raighan. “Show me the Witnessing again.”
Happy Scrapping!
The Hangul Smart Domain Organization is a new organization providing URL addresses in Hangul. The organization held a poll asking netizen which girl groups should be the first to receive a Hangul domain name. 10 choices were given in the poll, including SNSD, 2NE1, T-ara, KARA and others.
Among the items displayed alongside the Ten Commandments at Narrows High School are the Declaration of Independence, the Mayflower Compact, the Magna Carta, the words to the Star-Spangled Banner, and the Virginia Statute for Religious Freedom.
Some of these songs were on their first album. But now the sound quality is better and maybe even a little bit faster.
The Economist published my response to this article.SIR – You suggested that the supply of Somali shillings is fairly fixed despite a number of forgeries (“Hard to kill”, March 31st). In fact, it was the introduction of forged notes that ultimately removed the incentive to increase the supply of shillings in circulation.
By Katherine B. Hauth. Illus by David Clark. 2011. 48p. Charlesbridge (978-1570914720) Gr: 1-5.
- Inclusion and exclusion on the local level: citizenship ‘from below’?
#2 To work out a total of 750 minutes minimum. I am proud to say I worked out a total of 1045 minutes the month of January!!!! That is my best month to date! I rocked it just wish the scale showed it HA HA
Image/Stamp-Digital Set called Home Tweet Home by Studio 313
Number 4 on the list is variety. It’s the “spice of life”, as the saying goes. What I’m talking about here is adding variety to your workouts and therefore adding change and challenge too. Henry Ford puts it nicely: “If you always do what you’ve always done, you’ll always get what you’ve always got”. So, in my fitness and Pilates classes for new mums for example, I provide options and levels, and every week there’s something different eg we’re not doing the same exercises week in week out. If you’re not doing a structured exercise class like mine, then don’t worry. There could be ways for you to change and mix things up on your daily buggy walks. Do you always take the same route, for example? Are there any hills that you could walk up and down instead, that so far, you’ve been avoiding? Could you do the route to the shops and back in the opposite direction? If you’re serious about seeing some changes in your body shape and fitness level, doing slow, continuous-paced exercise eg a slow 30 minute walk, is not going to provide your heart and lungs with that much of a challenge. So, why not walk slowly for 1 minute, and pick up the pace for 2 minutes, so you’ve got an active work and an active rest phase. This is called “interval training” and it’s much more effective at burning fat and increasing your fitness level, than plodding along at the same speed for 30 minutes.
Enlightenment and spiritual awakening in the average individual leads to separation from the social order, generally, which has no way to process the sudden conversion of a once-normal 9-5 office drone into a state of 'holy madness.' The only difference between schizophrenia and holy spirit, then, is time and place... and coherence and artistic outlet. For example, Brad's crazy mom spoils him, buys him instruments and art supplies and paper and he's thus blocked from doing any art because of her suffocating supportiveness. If she could just leave him alone, or provide him with rules to rebel against, his madness would have contours to call its own.
Until the man I am has faded
“Hey, did one of you guys step on a toad back there?” Hop-a-long asked.
Amazingly, everyone finished on time and supping a most welcome cup of tea the professor sidled up to me.
Put the seashells, a spoon, and 2 or 3 paper cups in a bag. Zip up.
A gorgeous bag is one of the easiest ways I know of to add instant style and polish to an otherwise average outfit. Luckily, this week at my local Goodwill store, I happened to locate just such a gem waiting for me among the piles of cute clothing and other great finds – this darling, scarlet purse that’s the perfect accessory to add punch to my cool (and warmer) spring looks.
Long blurb
This compact storage caddy holds one of each size of our clear-mount blocks. The foam insert securely holds the blocks in place; an additional foam insert sits between the blocks to protect them when the caddy is closed.
As parents it is hard to find the time to still be intimate with each other. By intimate I mean having “the sex.” Not together during the day and tired as hell by the time you get the kids to bed. Usually I let my wife know that I’ll have sex dreams about her if she does the same for me.
Charlie Chuck – or, rather, Dave Kear – the man who is Chuck – covers an extraordinary range of British showbiz history in music and comedy, from meeting Bill Haley and the Comets through playing as a drummer in a soul and a hippie band to performing at US air bases in Germany for US troops going off to Vietnam, many of whom never returned… to being part of a highly successful German Oompah band and performing on the mainstream British holiday camp circuit before turning to alternative comedy, Malcolm Hardee, fame on the James Whale TV shows and The Smell of Reeves & Mortimer.
Well, I'll leave that for you to ponder over the weekend...
“I have two great enemies, the Southern Army in front of me and the financial institutions in the rear. Of the two the one in my rear is my greatest foe.” – Abraham Lincoln
- provide a convincing argument as to why the solution to the above objective technical problern that is put torward by the claim would not have been obvious to the skilled person. When I read this text block, I always feel that the examiner on the other side has not really understood what the Examination procedure is all about. He actually wants the applicant to execute the tasks of the examining division.
Buy Independent. You can find an indy bookstore and tell the bookseller you love the Blood Coven series and think he or she should stock it. Indy bookstores love to hear from their customers - they are not a big corporation and have more control over stocking books. So if they know you love it - they'll probably get at least a couple copies in. (Make sure you come back and buy one--to support their interest.)
And you're moving too slow
I don’t remember if I got my doll that year, or what my stocking held on Christmas morning. The things you think are special and important aren’t always so. Those things fade away with time, but the truly important things, they stay.
On the other hand, a small decline was seen in the South, where the share fell from 14% to 12% from the beginning of 2008 to the end of 2011. Nonetheless, as the South remains the largest home building region, the absolute number of townhouses started remains highest in the South at about 6,000 units for the final quarter of 2011 (compared to 2,000 in the West and 3,000 in the Northeast and Midwest respectively).
Elbow Off the Table, Napkin in the Lap, No Video
Waldron is aware of this danger. Although he accepts that party politics are here to stay, he worries about the executive dominating the legislature, and thinks that an executive-dominated second chamber would be worse than useless. He has two (closely related) solutions for this problem. First, prevent members of the second chamber from serving in the Cabinet. Second, make the second chamber not about government, but about oversight, and hope that voters notice the difference (and vote accordingly). But here again, I have strong doubts about the effectiveness of his proposals. The Canadian Senate shows that even people without any prospect of serving in the Cabinet can be quite partisan. In the U.S. too, many Senators probably lack executive-branch ambitions, yet are fiercely partisan (as are, of course, members of the House of Representatives, for the vast majority of whom the Senate is the height of their ambitions). And I wonder about the possibility of a second chamber exercising good -faith scrutiny – not tainted beyond redemption by partisan affinity or hostility – over the work of a first.
I see the magical relationship between gypsies and their most treasured possesions, their horses.
He came from the end of the corridor, where the sink was; probably washed his hands. But I never saw him come in.
I cut this stone to bring hope and change. Oh, make no mistake; before it came under my control this stone was once the largest, squarest and most durable stone ever found in the quarry! Amidst this quarry, whose stone has always been of the highest quality and repute, this one was originally hewn out of the bedrock by a group of craftsmen who came together and labored with skill and endurance to fulfill their keep safe their homes and possessions, feed their children and build an edifice made of the efforts and dreams of workers, soldiers and adventurers- each one his own master. This stone was the paragon. It was obviously a superb candidate to become the cornerstone for a great cathedral.
Corporations can kiss my ass by trying to control culture and telling me what’s trending, fuck them, i’m not a commodity, I’m a god damn human being and I seriously can’t take it anymore. I’m not a pawn, you don’t need my support, the only support you can get is control, and you ain’t got that from me! It’s like that movie, with the news guy, except now that’s even lost all meaning, people just tend to laugh it off as some nut, like me, just blowing off steam, you (the ignorant ones who could care less what i’m saying, all say to yourselves “Oh, he just needs a good blowjob and he’ll be alright, i know a great asian massage place i can suggest”)
“Why has your water usage suddenly gotten so low?”
De Proef Saison Imperial -- very nice
But a good punk rocker has to have a history, right? I haven’t even heard stories about this man, people just shake their heads. I ask him how he got his reputation.
White traveled to more than 100 countries, including many dangerous areas, in order to meet with and deliver aid to persecuted Christians and to document their testimonies for Christians in the West. He was in high demand as a speaker, sharing stories of the many persecuted Christians he met and worked with in his travels. Just weeks before his death, White traveled to China, where he met secretly with underground Bible school students.
Stuck is an intriguingly unique tale, focusing on a post-disaster Los Angeles as people with dark aspirations of power take advantage of chaos and vulnerability and use them as the stepping stones in their ascension to greatness. Based on that premise alone we’re immediately ready to throw our weight behind anyone who opposes the man who proclaims himself the voice of God, and luckily for us, we’re given a heroine who’s beyond strong on levels both human and superhuman and who stands her ground in a way we’d like to think we’d be capable of were we in her shoes. Ms. Bosworth does a beautiful job of combining the horrors humanity is capable of inflicting on itself with the damage both natural and supernatural are able to wreak on the physical landscape, allowing the world to feel real and tangible despite the addition of some rather fascinating individual abilities.
Ninety percent… and I repeat…
How cool is it when you can review something you actually really really need? Ecstatic!
Join with Sl St to first Ch to form a ring. Do not turn.
Those are just a few titles of my eclectic list of songs that I love to sing along with. I could spend all day on my favorites since there are so many. And, I may do a followup list another day when I can think of more song titles.
How could one compare and contrast two different sorts of pleasures?
Then there's Dan munching away, and a picture from my office window so you can see how wintery it still is.
